title,abstract
Particulate matter levels and children's lung function in a rural cohort near a drying saline lake.,"The drying Salton Sea in California is a growing source of wind-blown dust, raising particulate matter (PM) levels in surrounding areas. The impacts of these exposures on children's lung function remain poorly understood. We examined the relationship between PM levels and lung function in children near the Salton Sea. We enrolled 491 children (mean age: 10.2 years), who were followed over ~1.5 years, contributing 1,269 lung function assessments. Forced expiratory volume in the first second of exhalation (FEV Each 1 µg/m³ increase in average PM PM exposure near the Salton Sea is related to reduced lung function of pediatric residents."
Traffic-related air pollution in utero modifies cytokine responses to stimuli of umbilical cord blood cells: a cohort study.,"To examine the associations between in utero exposure to traffic-related air pollutants (TRAP) and cytokine responses to stimuli in newborns. Luminex technology was used to assess cytokine responses in umbilical cord blood of 235 newborns of the NELA cohort. Samples were cultured with mitogens, pathogen associated with molecular patterns (PAMPs) stimuli and common environmental allergens. Dispersion/chemical transport modelling was used to estimate in utero residential exposures to traffic-related nitrogen dioxide (NO Per 10μg/m Prenatal exposure to TRAP may promote higher proinflammatory and Th1-related and lower Th2-related cytokine responses to stimuli in the offspring."
Interactive Effects of Genetic Susceptibility and Early-Life Tobacco Smoke Exposure on the Asthma-Eczema Complex Phenotype in Children: 6-Year Follow-Up Case-Control Study.,"Atopic eczema and asthma frequently co-occur, forming a distinct complex phenotype that likely arises from shared genetic pathways and early-life environmental influences. We aimed to investigate whether variants in "
House dust allergens of children with newly diagnosed hazelnut or sesame allergy.,
PM,"Rhinitis and asthma often co-occur; however, studies on their associations with air pollution have always considered them separately. We investigated the association between long-term air pollution exposure and rhinitis and asthma multimorbidity in adults. Data at inclusion from Constances, a large French population-based adult cohort were used. Current Rhinitis (CR) and Current Asthma (CA) were defined by questionnaire. Annual exposure to nitrogen dioxide (NO Among the 177,968 participants included in the analyses (mean age: 47 yrs., 54% females), 111,108 (62%) were classified as no-CR/no-CA, 49,971 (28%) CR alone, 6,435 (4%) CA alone, and 10,454 (6%) CR+CA. One interquartile range (IQR) increase of BC and NO Our results show that long-term air pollution is more associated with rhinitis alone or with asthma multimorbidity than with asthma alone."
Association between subway iron particulate matter exposure and respiratory disease in New York City.,"Particulate matter exposure is linked to increased morbidity and mortality. Iron-rich particulate matter (PM2.5), common in rapid transit systems, is a potential but understudied contributor to respiratory illness. Using electronic health records (EHR) from 452,272 patients in the INSIGHT Clinical Research Network in New York City (2020-2023), we examined whether local iron exposure is associated with asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), breathing difficulties, or respiratory inhaler use. Iron exposure was estimated using particulate matter measurements from New York City (NYC) subway stations, linked to each patients residential census block group. To account for potential non-linear relationships, we applied linear probability models and an adjacent block group estimator with paired fixed effects to assess respiratory outcomes across deciles of iron exposure. We found that the relative risk of developing asthma, COPD, or breathing difficulties increased by 6-15% between the lowest two exposure deciles. Beyond this range, there was no significant association between iron exposure and respiratory disease. This suggests that iron exposure from rapid transit is associated with respiratory disease primarily at lower exposure levels, with limited health benefits from marginal reductions in iron exposure at already high exposure levels."
"Global, regional, and national burden of chronic respiratory diseases and impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, 1990-2023: a Global Burden of Disease study.","Chronic respiratory diseases, including chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), asthma, pneumoconiosis, interstitial lung disease (ILD) and pulmonary sarcoidosis, are major global causes of mortality and morbidity. Although the COVID-19 pandemic has influenced acute respiratory health, its impact on chronic respiratory conditions remains unclear. We estimated the global, regional and national burden of chronic respiratory diseases from 1990 to 2023, including risk factors, and evaluated how these burdens have shifted during the COVID-19 pandemic using the Global Burden of Disease Study 2023. In 2023, chronic respiratory diseases accounted for 569.2 million (95% uncertainty interval (UI), 508.8-639.8) cases and 4.2 million (3.6-5.1) deaths. The age-standardized death rate declined by 25.7% globally from 1990 to 2023 despite an increase in ILD and pulmonary sarcoidosis. Mortality declined in younger males, especially for asthma, whereas older adults experienced a rise in ILD and pulmonary sarcoidosis. Smoking was the primary risk factor for COPD, whereas high body mass index and silica exposure were key risk factors for asthma and pneumoconiosis. During the pandemic, the incidence of chronic respiratory diseases increased modestly, but the decline in mortality rates became more pronounced, highlighting the need for sustained global attention and action to address their long-term burden."
Most respiratory symptoms have resolved 9 years after PM,"In 2014, a coal mine fire in regional Australia exposed the local community to 6 weeks of hazardous fine particulate matter less than 2.5 µm in diameter (PM In 2016-2017 (wave 1, W1), 4,056 exposed and unexposed adult residents completed surveys, including validated questionnaires for respiratory symptoms. Individual PM Several patterns were observed. PM While there was some variation over time, exposure to mine fire-related PM"
Google Trends as a health sentinel. ALERT study: Analyzing Symptoms Perceptions Related To Environmental pollution.,"The relationship between environmental pollution and human health is well-documented, and exposure has been linked to an increased risk of respiratory and psychological diseases. In our clinical practice, a trend of self-medication and self-diagnosis has emerged, defined as independent web searches for self-reported symptoms aimed at obtaining a diagnosis and related treatment in the absence of medical advice. This study aims to investigate the relationship between air pollution and public health, focusing on the impact of particulate matter (PM 2.5, PM 10), nitrogen dioxide (NO2), ozone (O3), and other pollutants on respiratory and mental health, and their relationship with web searches for health-related topics. The study compares search trends for specific terms (e.g., cough, dyspnea, asthma, etc.), obtained using Google Trends, a tool for assessing public interest in health-related issues, with air main pollutants concentrations collected over the same period in 2024 in Genoa, Liguria region. Correlation between searches for cough and levels of PM 2.5, O3, benzene, and NO2 was established, while depression also showed a connection to PM 2.5 and benzene. These findings underscore the potential of Google Trends as a valuable resource for epidemiological surveillance. The study highlights the necessity for healthcare systems to adapt to the implications of air quality on health outcomes. It emphasizes the need for innovative approaches, including real-time tracking of air pollution and its health impacts, to enhance patient care and inform clinical practice. The integration of technology and data analytics in healthcare is proposed as a forward-looking strategy to improve therapeutic adherence and patient management in the context of environmental health challenges."
"The Interlinkages Between Ambient Temperature and Air Pollution in Exacerbating Childhood Asthma: A Time Series Study in Cape Town, South Africa.",
"""You Feel Empowered"": Parents' Emotional Responses to Air Pollution Sensing at Home.","Citizen science with particulate matter sensors at home increases awareness of pollution exposures and can inform health-protective actions, yet little research explores the emotional dimensions of sensing, especially across economic divides. This study shows that participatory air quality sensing is not emotionally neutral. We included 26 parents of asthmatic children in 10 weeks of participatory sensing with indoor and outdoor sensors to understand their exposure experiences. Drawing from weekly surveys and postproject interviews, we found that sensors often generated positive emotions (e.g., empowered, happy) across income levels, underscoring their potential as inclusive tools for asthma management. Parents less often reported negative emotions (e.g., stress, worry); when they did, those were spurred from checking outdoor readings (versus indoor) because outdoor exposures were less controllable. Parents managed emotions by creating contingent boundaries between indoor and outdoor spaces. We recommend expanding access to sensors and air purifiers to promote individual-level environmental health benefits."
Individual and combined effects of indoor home exposures and ambient PM,"Children encounter multiple indoor and outdoor environmental exposures in early life. We assessed the independent effects of indoor home exposures and ambient particulate matter with an aerodynamic diameter ≤2.5 µm (PM We included 6,413 children born 1987-2016 from nine United States prospective birth cohorts from the Environmental Influences on Child Health Outcomes consortium, with complete covariate and outcome data. Exposures were (1) average ambient PM By age 5 years, 10.3%-50.3% of children had developed asthma across general-risk and high-risk cohorts. We found a significant detrimental association of PM Multiple early exposures, such as PM"
Outdoor air pollutants and asthma risk in adolescents: evidence from a systematic review and meta-analysis.,"Existing epidemiological evidence linking outdoor air pollution to asthma incidence in adolescents remains inconclusive, due to methodological heterogeneity in study design, exposure assessment, and asthma case definitions. This systematic review and meta-analysis synthesized observational studies examining associations between outdoor air pollutants and adolescent asthma. Comprehensive searches of PubMed, Embase, and Scopus were conducted using Medical Subject Headings (MeSH) and free-text terms. Eligible studies reported quantitative estimates, odds ratio (OR), hazard ratio (HR), relative risk (RR), prevalence ratio (PR), incidence rate ratio (IRR), or prevalence odds ratio (POR), with corresponding 95% confidence interval (CI). Pooled estimates were calculated using inverse-variance weighted fixed- and random-effects models. Heterogeneity was assessed using Cochran's  Of 51 eligible studies, 40 were incorporated into the meta-analysis. Statistically significant associations were identified for each 10 μg/m This meta-analysis highlights significant associations between adolescent asthma and specific combustion-related air pollutants. Future research should prioritize standardized exposure metrics, life-course cohort designs, and multipollutant modeling to inform targeted prevention and public health strategies. https://www.crd.york.ac.uk/prospero/, identifier PROSPERO database (CRD42024622246)."
Unravelling the exposome of severe exacerbations of obstructive respiratory diseases in France.,"Understanding the influence of environmental and socioeconomic factors, collectively known as the exposome, on severe exacerbation risks in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) and asthma is crucial for enhancing patient care. We assessed the impact of the exposome on COPD and asthma severe exacerbations in France between 2018 and 2022, combining data from the French National Hospital Discharge Programme de Médicalisation des Systèmes d'Information database and open data for multiple environmental exposition. Using a retrospective matched case-control design, 473 990 patients with COPD and 187 332 patients with asthma were matched for sex, birth year and date of first hospitalisation. Conditional logistic regressions were performed to quantify ORs of exacerbations within the studied population. In a multivariate model, exposure to extreme cold temperatures and exceeding WHO standards for nitrogen dioxide (NO The study highlights how exposome factors influence bronchial diseases and underscores the benefit of open-access data for advancing research. COPD and asthma exacerbations account for numerous deaths and cost billions and will increase with global warming, identifying modifiable environmental risk factors, improving patient care and helping shape valuable public health policies."
Early-Onset Wheeze Trajectories in Infants: The Phenotyping of Wheezing Infants (P-WIN) Study.,"Recurrent wheeze in infancy is common; although symptoms often resolve, some children develop persistent disease. To better capture clinical heterogeneity, we analyzed wheeze trajectories based on symptom frequency rather than simply recording presence or absence. To identify distinct wheeze phenotypes in 1-year-old children with recurrent wheeze by modeling longitudinal wheezing frequency trajectories. We conducted a 2-year, multicenter prospective cohort study involving children aged 12-23 months with recurrent wheeze at 27 sites in Japan. Monthly caregiver-reported wheeze frequency was collected, and trajectories were classified using latent class growth analysis. Clinical characteristics, environmental exposures, and biomarkers were assessed at enrollment and age 3. Ordinal and binary logistic regression analyses were performed to identify risk and protective factors. Among 253 enrolled children, 219 completed follow-up. Four trajectories were identified: Early-Resolving (24.2%), Low-Frequency with Mid-Peak (57.1%), Persistent High-Frequency (12.8%), and Late-Peaking High-Frequency (5.9%). The latter two groups showed greater symptom burden, including more frequent corticosteroid use and interference with daily activities. Ordinal logistic regression showed that parental allergic rhinitis and pet ownership were associated with lower odds of more severe trajectories. Binary logistic regression comparing high- (Clusters 3-4) versus low-frequency (Clusters 1-2) groups revealed parental smoking as a strong risk factor (OR 5.49), while allergic rhinitis (OR 0.12) and pet ownership (OR 0.11) remained protective. High-frequency wheeze trajectories were linked to greater clinical burden. Early identification of at-risk children and targeted environmental interventions-particularly avoidance of passive smoking-may reduce morbidity in early-onset recurrent wheeze."
Airway transcriptome networks for ozone and PM,"Air pollution disproportionately affects individuals with asthma, triggering asthma exacerbations and morbidity. We hypothesized that children with and without asthma have distinct airway transcriptome networks associated with ozone and particulate matter ≤ 2.5 µm (PM We recruited children from the New York metropolitan area, mapped their air pollutant exposures, and collected nasal and bronchial samples for transcriptome and cellular profiling. We used causal network construction and key driver analyses to build airway transcriptome networks for ozone and PM The cohort included 307 children, including 167 (54.4%) with asthma and 140 (45.6%) without asthma. The mean age was 13.4 years (SD 4.4 years). Among children with asthma, the airway causal network and its key drivers represented pro-inflammatory adaptive immune processes. Six key driver transcripts for ozone (CLC, CPA3, FGL2, LGALS12, IL7R, HRH4) and three key driver transcripts for PM Children with and without asthma have very distinct causal networks and key drivers for ozone and PM"
"What do the clinical and respiratory functional assessments of woodworkers in Parakou, West Africa, reveal?","The prevalence of chronic respiratory diseases is increasing globally. Apart from smoking, other contributing factors include occupational exposures, of which wood dust is thought to play a role. This study aimed to investigate relationships between respiratory symptoms or lung function measurements and exposure to wood dust. This was a prospective and comparative cross-sectional study carried out at Parakou, between June and September 2024. Overall, 108 woodworkers (exposed group) and 108 administrative agents from the city hall, the court and five selected banks (control group) were included. Data were collected on upper and lower respiratory symptoms persisting for at least one week in the last 12 months, demographic and occupational-related characteristics, comorbidities, lifestyles, followed by particulate matter  measurements in the workplace and spirometry testing. The mean ages of participants in exposed and control groups were 40±11 and 38±9 years-old, respectively (p=0.163). All were males. Seniority in the profession was longer in the exposed group (18±12 years vs 8±6 years; p<0.001). Workplace ventilation was found inadequate in the exposed group (27% vs 0%; p<0.001). In carpentry, Milicia excelsa (66%) and Afzelia africana (64%) were the types of wood most commonly used. Mean dust levels for PM10, PM2.5 and PM1.0 were 1.4±0.6 mg/m3, 1.2±0.6 mg/m3 and 1.2±0.6 mg/m3, respectively. Cleaning and protection methods for woodworkers included dry sweeping (61%), dust collection devices (7%), personal homemade face-masks (99%), and affiliation to company insurance schemes (12%).No worker had planned check-ups arranged with an occupational physician. Both respiratory symptoms (94% vs 56%; p<0.001) and work-related respiratory symptoms (92% vs 19%; p<0.001) were more common in the exposed versus control group. Exposure to wood dust (aPR=6.8; 95%CI=4.1-11.4; p<0.001) and asthma (aPR=5.4; 95%CI=2.9-10.1; p<0.001) were significantly associated with respiratory symptoms, after adjustment for biomass and passive smoking exposure and length in the profession. The exposed group had a higher prevalence of restrictive disorder suggestive pattern on spirometry than the control group (48% vs 20%; p<0.001). Exposure to wood dust adversely affects respiratory function in woodworkers at Parakou, hence the need to raise awareness among these professionals and identify ways to improve their working conditions."
PM2.5 exposure exacerbates airway pyroptosis related inflammatory response in asthmatic mice by activating NLRP3 inflammasome.,"Fine particulate matter (PM2.5)-induced airway epithelial damage plays a pivotal role in driving the development of airway inflammation. Although pyroptosis is recognized for its highly proinflammatory nature, its precise role in PM2.5-associated airway inflammation, particularly in asthmatic condition, remains to be fully elucidated. In ovalbumin (OVA)-sensitized asthmatic mice, we assessed pulmonary histopathology, inflammatory cell counts and Th2 cytokine levels (IL-4, IL-5, and IL-13) in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid (BALF), airway hyperresponsiveness (AHR), and airway epithelial pyroptosis. To investigate the effects of PM2.5 on airway epithelial cells, BEAS-2B cells were exposed to PM2.5. Cell viability was evaluated using the CCK-8 assay, while pyroptosis-related protein levels and inflammatory cytokine release were analyzed by Western blot and ELISA, respectively. Additionally, transmission electron microscopy (TEM) was employed to examine PM2.5-induced ultrastructural changes in BEAS-2B cells. To further elucidate the underlying mechanism, we administered the NLRP3 inhibitor MCC950 and the Caspase-1 inhibitor Ac-YVAD-cmk to verify the involvement of NLRP3 inflammasome activation and pyroptosis in PM2.5-exposed asthmatic mice. PM2.5 exposure significantly aggravated airway inflammation in asthmatic mice, as demonstrated by elevated histopathological inflammatory scores in lung tissues and increased pro-inflammatory cytokine levels in BALF. Furthermore, PM2.5 upregulated the abundance of pyroptosis-related markers, namely NLRP3, Caspase-1, GSDMD, and IL-1β, in the lung tissues of asthmatic mice. In BEAS-2B cells, PM2.5 exposure led to a dose-dependent reduction in cell viability and promoted the activation of NLRP3 inflammasome, subsequently leading to Caspase-1-mediated GSDMD cleavage and IL-1β secretion. TEM further confirmed pyroptosis, revealing characteristic morphological alterations such as cytoplasmic vacuolation, mitochondrial swelling, and plasma membrane pore formation in BEAS-2B cells exposed to PM2.5. Critically, inhibition of NLRP3 (MCC950) or Caspase-1 (Ac-YVAD-cmk) markedly attenuated PM2.5-induced pyroptosis and ameliorated airway inflammation in asthmatic mice, underscoring the pivotal role of the NLRP3/Caspase-1/GSDMD axis in this pathogenic process. Our findings demonstrate that PM2.5 exposure induces airway epithelial pyroptosis through NLRP3 inflammasome activation, thereby exacerbating airway inflammation in asthmatic mice."
"Association between yellow dust, PM2.5, and hay fever: A large-scale crowdsourced observational study using the AllerSearch smartphone application.","This large-scale crowdsourced observational study investigated the association between yellow dust, particulate matter 2.5 (PM2.5), and hay fever symptoms using the AllerSearch smartphone application. Participants with hay fever were divided into four groups based on combinations of high and low pollen and PM2.5/yellow dust dispersion levels. Nine hay fever symptom scores and quality of life (QoL) scores were compared among the groups. Multivariate analysis evaluated independent associations between pollen and PM2.5/yellow dust dispersion levels and hay fever symptom and QoL scores. Risk factors for individuals experiencing worsening hay fever symptoms during PM2.5/yellow dust dispersion were evaluated using multivariate logistic regression analysis. This analysis included 6468 participants. All hay fever symptom scores except ""ear and/or mouth itching,"" and all QoL scores were significantly higher in the ""low pollen and moderate-to-high PM2.5/yellow dust"" group versus the ""low pollen and low PM2.5/yellow dust"" group. PM2.5/yellow dust levels independently associated with worsening of hay fever symptom and QoL scores, except for ""ear and/or mouth itching."" Being a woman (P = 0.010), a history of atopic dermatitis (P = 0.013), bronchial asthma (P = 0.046), dry eye disease (P = 0.048), oral medication (P = 0.009) and air purifier use (P = 0.043) were significant risk factors for worsening hay fever symptoms during PM2.5/yellow dust dispersion. Our findings suggest that PM2.5 and yellow dust exacerbated hay fever symptoms independent of pollen exposure, with distinct symptom profiles."
Associations of Early Life Ambient PM,"To examine whether exposure to fine particulate matter (PM We conducted a retrospective cohort study of 337 infants with BPD, born between 2010 and 2019, who survived to discharge with clinical follow-up in the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia Care Network through age 5. Daily residential census block group PM By age 5 years, 169 (50.1%) infants had an asthma diagnosis. Mean annual PM Exposure to higher ambient PM"
sPLA,"Poultry farm workers are highly susceptible to developing lung inflammatory diseases (asthma, COPD, ARDS, and ALI) due to prolonged exposure to organic dust and other airborne irritants in confined poultry facilities. Secretory phospholipase A2 (sPLA"
Spatiotemporal patterns of asthma in Bhutan: a Bayesian analysis.,"Asthma is a chronic respiratory disorder requiring ongoing medical management. This ecological study investigated the spatial and temporal patterns of notification rates for asthma from clinic visits and hospital discharges and identified demographic, meteorological and environmental factors that drive asthma in Bhutan. Monthly numbers of asthma notifications from 2016 to 2022 were obtained from the Bhutan Ministry of Health. Climatic variables (rainfall, relative humidity, minimum and maximum temperature) were obtained from the National Centre for Hydrology and Meteorology, Bhutan. The Normalised Difference Vegetation Index (NDVI) and surface particulate matter (PM2.5) were extracted from open sources. A multivariable zero-inflated Poisson regression (ZIP) model was developed in a Bayesian framework to quantify the relationship between risk of asthma and sociodemographic and environmental correlates, while also identifying the underlying spatial structure of the data. There were 12 696 asthma notifications, with an annual average prevalence of 244/100 000 population between 2016 and 2022. In ZIP analysis, asthma notifications were 3.4 times (relative risk (RR)=3.39; 95% credible interval (CrI) 3.047 to 3.773) more likely in individuals aged >14 years than those aged ≤14 years, and 43% (RR=1.43; 95% CrI 36.5% to 49.2%) more likely for females than males. Asthma notification increased by 0.8% (RR=1.008, 95% CrI 0.2% to 1.5%) for every 10 cm increase in rainfall, and 1.7% (RR=1.017; 95% CrI 1.2% to 2.3%) for a 1°C increase in maximum temperature. An increase in one unit of NDVI and 10 µg/m Environmental risk factors and spatial clusters of asthma notifications were identified. Identification of spatial clusters and environmental risk factors can help develop targeted interventions that maximise impact of limited public health resources for controlling asthma in Bhutan."
Allergic Sensitization Worsens Respiratory Health in Children With Asthma During Dust and Pollen Periods.,"The Eastern Mediterranean has climatic conditions that increase exposure to aeroallergens due to higher pollen counts and dust storms. The association of atopy with measures of respiratory health, including fractional exhaled nitric oxide (FeNO) and pulmonary function among asthmatic children during dust and pollen periods has not been assessed. Examine the association between allergic sensitization and respiratory health in children with asthma during dust and pollen seasons in the Eastern Mediterranean. We conducted an analysis of prospectively collected respiratory health data from schoolchildren with asthma in Cyprus and Crete-Greece during spring and fall of 2019 and 2021. Children were assessed 3 to 4 times over 4 months, including evaluation of allergic sensitization by skin prick tests (SPTs). Mixed effect models were applied, adjusting for potential confounders, including study year, location, weeks on study, age and sex. There were 131 children included (77 atopic and 54 non-atopic; mean (SD) age = 9.5 (1.6) years; 65% boys). Over the study period, atopic children exhibited 113.71% (95% CI: 68.08%, 171.73%) higher FeNO concentrations and reduced FEV Atopic children with asthma may experience greater morbidity compared to non-atopic children during dust and pollen periods. Given the long-range transport of desert dust, clinicians both within and beyond the Eastern Mediterranean should be aware of this health concern."
Urban Sprawl and Asthma: Exploring the Role of Green Space and Air Pollution as Mediators.,"Rapid urbanization in China has reshaped urban spatial form with potential consequences for respiratory health. We examined the association between the Urban Sprawl Index (USI) - where higher values indicate a more dispersed, less compact urban form - and asthma and quantified mediation via ambient air pollution and park green space. We analyzed 11,043 respondents from the 2015 wave of the nationally representative China Health and Retirement Longitudinal Study (CHARLS). Asthma was based on a self-reported physician diagnosis. Multivariable logistic regression estimated the association between USI and asthma using quartiles and restricted cubic splines; models adjusted for sociodemographic, behavioral, and health covariates. We conducted subgroup analyses and performed causal mediation with nonparametric bootstrapping (5,000 resamples) to estimate the average causal mediation effect (ACME), average direct effect (ADE), and proportion mediated for particulate matter ≤2.5 µm (PM Higher USI was associated with greater odds of asthma. An interquartile-range increase in USI was associated with a 15.1% increase in the odds of asthma (OR = 1.151; 95% CI: 1.034-1.282; p = 0.010), with a clear dose-response across USI quartiles and a monotonic pattern in spline analyses. Associations varied by marital status and education (p for interaction < 0.05). In mediation analyses, ∼7-12% of the total effect was mediated - ∼11.7% via park green space and ∼7.5% via PM More dispersed, sprawling urban form is associated with higher asthma, partly mediated by reduced park green space and increased PM"
Wildfire smoke and pediatric asthma control in the Northeastern United States: a cross-sectional study.,"Poor air quality due to smoke from distant wildfires is a growing risk for the Northeastern United States, a region largely unaffected by these events until recently. Despite this emerging threat, few studies have examined the effect of wildfire smoke on respiratory health in this region. We investigated the association between wildfire smoke exposure and pediatric asthma control in Vermont and upstate New York. We extracted data from the electronic health records of youth aged 3-21 years diagnosed with asthma within a single regional healthcare system and included three clinical measures of asthma control: Test for Respiratory and Asthma Control in Kids (3-4 years), Asthma Therapy Assessment Questionnaire (5-21 years), and the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute (NHLBI) asthma control guidelines (3-21 years). We first compared asthma control in the smoke-affected summer of 2023 to the largely unaffected summers of 2022 and 2024 using regression models, controlling for pollen exposure. We then obtained airborne particulate matter (PM The study sample included 1,217 encounters (mean age 9.1 ± 4.4 years, 57% male). Asthma control was significantly worse in the severely smoke-affected summer of 2023 versus 2022 for two of the three clinical measures but was not different between 2023 and 2024 for any of the clinical measures. Within summer 2023, there were no significant associations between ZIP code-level PM Wildfire smoke exposure in the Northeast was associated with decreased asthma control in this pediatric population, though not consistently across years and all clinical measures. As climate change drives longer and more intense wildfire seasons, continued monitoring is needed to understand the impact on pediatric respiratory health in this historically low-exposed region."
Examining the Interaction between Allergic Asthma and Air Pollution: a Potential Role for Trained Immunity.,"Asthma represents a major global health burden, with incidence increasing substantially over the past 50 years. Epidemiologic studies have linked this rise in asthma to escalating air pollution; however, the biological mechanisms remain undefined. Recent evidence has highlighted a role for innate immune memory, or trained immunity, in asthma pathogenesis; however, the contribution of air pollution remains unclear. This review synthesizes emerging findings on how air pollution shapes trained immunity in asthma and related inflammatory lung diseases. Air pollutants increase gene acetylation and methylation and disrupt innate immune cell metabolism. These immune mediated changes are consistent with features of trained immunity, a process that remains largely underexplored. Collectively, these data support the concept that air pollution imprints long-lasting epigenomic and immunometabolic changes on innate immune cells, thereby contributing to asthma susceptibility and severity. Future studies will focus on mechanistic investigations to further elucidate how pollutants dysregulate innate immune memory."
"Facemask and respirator use for bushfire smoke protection: A cross-country comparison of public health policies in Australia, Canada, India, and the United States.","As climate change intensifies the frequency and severity of bushfires, exposure to bushfire smoke is emerging as a significant public health concern, associated with numerous adverse health outcomes, including exacerbation of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, asthma, cardiovascular diseases, and respiratory infections. This study examined policies related to the use of masks and respirators as protective measures against smoke exposure. Policies and guidelines of health departments, emergency and fire services, and other relevant organisations of selected countries were reviewed. Guidelines were sourced from organizational websites, PubMed, and Google Scholar using specific keywords. There is variability in policies regarding mask and respirator use during bushfires. Health departments generally recommend using P2/ N95 respirators to protect the public from particulate exposure arising bushfire smoke, while emergency and fire services generally recommend surgical or cloth masks. Few guidelines provided detailed instructions on the proper use of respirators, including fit testing, or fit checking procedures. Most guidelines emphasised monitoring air quality and avoiding bushfire smoke, particularly for high-risk groups. There is no guidance provided on the length of time a mask should be used in any guideline. The inconsistent recommendations from health organisations and countries regarding mask and respirator use during bushfires highlights the lack of high-quality evidence in this area. Health, emergency and fire services, and other relevant organisations should provide clear guidance around types of facemasks, the length of time a facemask should be used and on proper use of respirators use, including training and fit checking."
Molecular mechanisms of air pollution-induced carcinogenesis and the emerging role of microplastics.,"Ambient air pollution is a major environmental carcinogen consisting of a complex mixture of particulate matter, gases, and adsorbed toxicants. Fine (PM"
Study on the health impacts of childhood asthma in China caused by air pollution.,"Asthma is one of the major disease burdens in children. Ambient air pollution is associated with the prevalence and exacerbation of childhood asthma. Over recent decades, China has exhibited a persistent upward trajectory in pediatric asthma prevalence. This epidemiological trend necessitates a comprehensive evaluation of the health impacts associated with childhood asthma attributable to ambient air pollution exposure. This study selected PM2.5, NO2, and O3 as representative ambient air pollutants in China, and obtained exposure-response parameters required for health impact assessment through Meta-analysis. Then the study evaluated the health impacts of childhood asthma aged 0-14 years attributable to air pollution in 336 cities across China based on national real-time air quality monitoring data. Hypothetical scenarios were also constructed to predict the preventable childhood asthma disease burden under different air pollution control levels. The results showed that in 2019, air pollution caused 264,800-467,100 childhood asthma exacerbation cases and 622,800-1115,000 incident asthma cases among children, accounting for 7.1% - 12.5% and 31.4% - 56.2% of the total asthma children visits and incidence of childhood asthma in that year. The pollutant that has the greatest impact on childhood asthma is O3, followed by PM2.5 and NO2. The health impacts of the three pollutants were spatially distributed to be higher in the central and southern regions of China, and lower in the southwestern, northeastern, and northwestern regions. Chongqing was the city most affected by three types of pollutants. When pollutant concentrations comply with the WHO guidelines, up to 267,900 cases of childhood asthma exacerbations and 873,900 new-onset childhood asthma cases could be averted."
Inflammatory and Immune Effects of Pollution: Comparison Between Patients With Asthma and Healthy Individuals.,"The objective of this study was to assess inflammatory and immune responses in patients with asthma and healthy controls exposed to a polluted and a nonpolluted environment over a short period. We performed a randomized crossover study in patients with asthma (n=20) and in healthy controls (n=15). Participants were exposed for 2 hours to a polluted environment and, after 14 days, to a nonpolluted environment. Pollution levels were assessed at each exposure. Subsequently, serum levels of 8-isoprostane and glutathione peroxidase were measured as markers of oxidative stress, as were 48 cytokines involved in inflammation and the immune response. In the polluted environment, significantly higher levels of PM1, PM10, NO2, NO, and CO were observed (P=.0026, .0337, <.0001, <.0001, and .0004, respectively) than in the nonpolluted environment. After exposure to a polluted environment, both groups (healthy controls and asthma patients) presented higher values of IL-17F (P=.0285 and .0348, respectively) and CSF2 (P=.0425 and 0.0305, respectively). After exposure to high levels of pollution, healthy controls presented reductions in glutathione peroxidase (with antioxidant activity), CSF3, HGF, and OSM (P=.0038, P=.0123, 0.0353, and 0.0256, respectively) and increased levels of IL-7, CXCL8, and CCL2 (P=.0015, 0.0119 and 0.0215, respectively). Asthma patients had higher serum levels of IL-1ß and IL-15 (P=.0232 and 0.0497, respectively). Healthy individuals and asthma patients respond differently to exposure to pollutants. Healthy individuals are characterized by adaptive suppression of immune activity, whereas asthma patients present a more marked inflammatory response."
Air pollution and health of working-age population: Evidence from thermal inversion.,"Despite the significant impact of air pollution on public health, its causal effects on a national scale have not been extensively studied. In this paper, we examine the impact of PM2.5 on adult health in the United States using data from the Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance System for 2001-2012, focusing on a period of relatively low pollution levels. To address the endogeneity issue, we use the two-stage least squares regression with thermal inversion as an instrumental variable. Our findings provide evidence of the ongoing negative impact of air pollution on overall health. In particular, we find that a 1 µg/m"
Occupational airborne exposures and asthma mortality - examining asthma as the underlying and contributing cause of death.,"The aim was to elucidate whether occupational airborne exposures increases asthma mortality. The study comprised men in the Swedish construction industry who participated in health controls in 1971-1993. Exposure was assessed using a job-exposure matrix with focus on exposures in the mid-1970s. Mortality from asthma in 1987-2015 was compared between 147,101 workers exposed to occupational airborne exposures and 26,879 foremen, using underlying and contributory cause of death from the Swedish Cause of Death Register. Mortality was assessed as relative risk with 95% confidence intervals using Poisson regression models adjusting for age, smoking, body mass index, and calendar time. Among exposed workers, there were 82 deaths with asthma as the underlying cause and 212 deaths with asthma as the contributory cause vs. ten and 21 deaths in the controls. The asthma mortality based on the underlying and contributory cause was 1.92 (1.31-2.83) in relation to inorganic dust, 2.17 (1.47-3.20) in relation to fumes, 1.60 (1.04-2.47) in relation to gases, and 1.79 (1.09-2.96) in relation to wood dust. Using only the underlying cause of death showed similar mortality estimates, but with wider confidence intervals including unity. Occupational airborne exposures increased the asthma mortality, underscoring the need for further reduction of the airborne occupational exposures. Workers with asthma should be given information about the effects of exposure and support to decrease exposure. The study shows the importance of using both contributing and underlying cause of death in studies assessing asthma mortality risk in relation to air pollutants."
Exposure to environmental xenobiotics and lung tissue function: A comprehensive review on biological mechanisms and pathways.,"Environmental xenobiotics, encompassing a wide spectrum of chemical pollutants such as particulate matter-bound polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), volatile organic compounds (VOCs), persistent organic pollutants (POPs), heavy metals, endocrine-disrupting chemicals (EDCs), pesticides, and emerging contaminants like nanomaterials and microplastics, have been increasingly implicated in impairing lung tissue function. These agents enter the body primarily through inhalation, particularly via outdoor air pollution, indoor contaminants, and occupational exposures, with additional contributions from ingestion and dermal absorption. Studies investigating these pollutants employ diverse exposure assessment methods, including environmental and biological monitoring, model-based estimations, and questionnaire-based tools. Lung function assessment spans from clinical spirometry and imaging to experimental histopathology and molecular biomarker analyses. Mechanistic evidence reveals that xenobiotics induce lung injury through oxidative stress, inflammation, mitochondrial dysfunction, epithelial barrier disruption, and epigenetic alterations. These processes lead to chronic respiratory diseases such as asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pulmonary fibrosis, and lung cancer. Key signaling pathways implicated include activation of NF-κB, AP-1, and the aryl hydrocarbon receptor (AhR), promoting pro-inflammatory and cytotoxic responses. Furthermore, pollutant-induced epithelial permeability and fibrotic remodeling via TGF-β signaling exacerbate lung tissue damage and functional decline. While spirometry is widely used in population studies, it lacks sensitivity for early pathophysiological changes, necessitating integration with molecular and imaging approaches. Experimental models and in vitro studies provide valuable mechanistic insight, though challenges remain in translating findings to human populations. Current research underscores the complexity of real-world exposure scenarios and highlights the need for harmonized, multidisciplinary approaches combining environmental, biological, and molecular data. This comprehensive review synthesizes evidence across epidemiological and experimental studies, aiming to elucidate the biological pathways by which xenobiotic exposure compromises lung tissue function and to inform future research and regulatory strategies."
Climate Change and Air Pollution-Related Health Effects on Pain.,"Climate change-related weather extremes and air pollution have wide-ranging health effects, with emerging evidence suggesting a potential influence on pain. This narrative review explores the relationship between climate-related weather parameters/air pollution with pain across various conditions, including chronic and acute musculoskeletal pain, postoperative pain, headache/migraine, dysmenorrhea, and chest pain. Included studies were published in 2014 or later. Findings indicate that higher humidity/dampness may exacerbate pain in individuals with knee osteoarthritis, while extremes in temperature and humidity are linked to a higher risk of gout arthritis attacks. No clinically meaningful associations were found between weather parameters and acute low-back pain. However, lower barometric pressure, elevated temperatures, and possibly higher humidity may influence postoperative pain levels. Headache and migraine episodes were more frequent during heat waves and periods of high humidity or rainfall, as well as in areas with elevated traffic-related air pollutants and particulate matter. Air pollution exposure was also associated with increased risk of dysmenorrhea, while lower temperatures and higher humidity correlated with more severe menstrual cramps. Temperature extremes were linked to chest pain in patients with asthma and other conditions. Overall, this review highlights the disproportionate pain-related burden of climate change and air pollution on women and emphasizes the need for further research."
"Dust air pollution and hospital visits for respiratory, cardiovascular, and eye diseases in Eastern Iran.","One of the most significant environmental concerns that has been spreading in recent years due to human interference and irrational use of natural resources is the phenomenon of dust. This study investigated the relationship between dust air pollution and the burden of daily hospital visits due to respiratory, cardiovascular, and eye diseases. In this cross-sectional study, data on dust air pollution were collected from the Environment office and data on daily visits to hospitals from the hospital information system (HIS) through a checklist. Data analysis was performed using SPSS 22 software and Pearson correlation coefficient at a significance level of < 0.05. The average dust air pollution index in the studied area was 2233.71 ± 4737.52 µg/m³. The mean number of hospital visits for various conditions were as follows: pneumonia, 63.76 ± 84.72; eye diseases, 46.8 ± 70.2; chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), 62.5 ± 83.3; asthma, 64.7 ± 87.0; dyspnea, 63.8 ± 90.8; and cardiovascular diseases, 56.5 ± 66.2 patients. A significant moderate positive linear correlation was found between dust air pollution levels and daily hospital visits for pneumonia, dyspnea, COPD, asthma, eye diseases, and cardiovascular diseases (p < 0.0001). As air pollution increased, the number of hospital visits for these conditions also rose. The strongest correlation was observed between dust air pollution and dyspnea (r = 0.497), while the weakest correlation was found between dust air pollution and eye diseases (r = 0.406). Exposure to dust air pollution was correlated with hospital admissions for respiratory diseases, such as pneumonia, asthma, and COPD, as well as cardiovascular diseases and eye issues. It seems that using personal protection strategies by habitants to reduce dust exposure and implementation of long-term strategies by policymakers for controlling dust air pollution especially dust controlling for this region are necessary."
Distinct DNA methylation in mother-infant dyads exposed to PM2.5 in pregnancy.,"Air pollution exposure during pregnancy increases the risk of allergic and respiratory diseases, yet its epigenetic effects across the maternal-fetal interface remain poorly understood. We conducted a pilot study of 10 mother-infant dyads near Fresno, California, to investigate whether prenatal air pollution exposure is associated with differential DNA methylation (DNAm) in maternal peripheral blood mononuclear cells (PBMCs) and infant cord blood mononuclear cells (CBMCs). Using a custom DNAm array targeting high-value allergy- and asthma-associated loci, we identified 24 CpG sites in maternal PBMCs and 18 in infant CBMCs associated with PM2.5 exposure. Only one CpG site was shared between PBMCs and CBMCs, suggesting largely distinct DNAm responses to PM2.5 in maternal and fetal circulations. Further research is needed to validate these associations and determine their functional implications for immune development and disease risk."
Long-term exposure to black carbon and incident asthma and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in adults: The Danish Nurse Cohort.,"Air pollution is a known risk factor for chronic respiratory diseases, including asthma and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). However, evidence regarding the role of black carbon (BC) remains mixed and sparse. This study aimed to examine the association of long-term exposure to air pollution, focusing on BC, with incident asthma and COPD in adults. We followed 28,731 female nurses from the Danish Nurse Cohort from baseline (1993/1999) until the end of 2018, tracking their first-ever hospital contact (inpatient, outpatient, or emergency visit) for asthma or COPD. Annual mean concentrations of BC, fine particulate matter (PM Over an average follow-up of 23 years, 633 nurses developed asthma, and 1145 developed COPD. We found long-term exposure to BC was consistently associated with increased risks of both asthma and COPD, with hazard ratios (HR) per 0.34 μg/m We observed that BC is an independent risk factor for developing chronic respiratory diseases, such as asthma and COPD, and BC may play a more significant role than PM"
The gut-lung axis: a new perspective on the impact of atmospheric particulate matter exposure on chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.,"Environmental pollution is a serious public health problem closely related to various chronic respiratory diseases, such as chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), bronchial asthma, and lung malignancies. Atmospheric particulate matter (PM) is an important component of environmental pollution, and its influence on COPD has been shown to be related to inflammation, oxidative stress, immune imbalance, abnormal cell death, and cell aging. A growing body of evidence has shown that an imbalance of the lung and intestinal microbiota, as well as changes in metabolites, is closely related to the occurrence and development of PM-induced COPD. PM exposure damages the respiratory system and alters the structure and activity of the gut microbiome. The metabolites produced by the gut microbiome, in turn, disrupt airway immunity and exacerbate respiratory inflammation. Therefore, the bidirectional influence of PM on the gut-lung axis has attracted widespread attention. This review explores the mechanisms by which PM causes oxidative stress damage to the lungs and intestines, as well as the characteristics of the resultant immune imbalance and changes in the microbiota and metabolite products. It also describes how PM disrupts barrier function through microecological imbalance and how it participates in the progression of COPD via the gut-lung axis. These mechanisms highlight the potential of targeting the microbial flora as a new approach for treating COPD caused by environmental pollution."
Assessing the health benefits and economic costs of interventions to reduce exposure to air pollution from biomass combustion in Australia.,Fine particulate matter (PM
Evidence for Aerosolized Environmental Bacterial Endotoxin as an Environmental Health Hazard.,The high incidence of asthma near California's Salton Sea is attributed to dust emitted from the exposed lakebed. A survey of clinical symptoms conducted in the region revealed distinct spatial distribution with strong geospatial correlations between asthma symptoms and prevailing wind direction as well as with PM
Early Life Intervention in Paediatrics Supported by E-Health (ELIPSE)-a coaching app for parents to reduce obesity and second-hand smoke exposure in children: study protocols for two parallel-group randomised controlled trials.,"Family lifestyle factors-such as physical activity, diet and parental smoking-are key modifiable determinants for child health. Physical inactivity and calorie-dense diets contribute to obesity, which is linked to 75% of all non-communicable diseases (NCDs). Second-hand smoke (SHS) exposure significantly increases the risk of respiratory NCDs in children, including asthma. Cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT) has proven effective in modifying harmful parental behaviours, but it remains unclear whether app-based CBT for parents can improve family behaviours and child health outcomes. The Early Life Intervention in Paediatrics Supported by E-Health (ELIPSE) project aims to implement and evaluate personalised, family-centred, guided e-health interventions delivered via the ELIPSE mobile app. In two randomized controlled trials (ELIPSE I and II), the ELIPSE app will deliver CBT elements, tailored thematic content, and personalised feedback, all remotely guided by a coach. In ELIPSE I, 148 parent-child dyads (child age 6-12 years, BMI > 97th percentile) are randomly assigned 1:1 to treatment as usual (TAU; control group) versus TAU plus full access to the activated ELIPSE app (intervention group). The primary endpoint is the change in children's ratio of total energy intake to total energy expenditure (TEI/TEE). Secondary endpoints include obesity severity and cardiometabolic risk factors. In ELIPSE II, 160 dyads of a smoking parent and child (< 6 years) are randomly assigned 1:1 to receive either a leaflet on protecting children from SHS exposure (control group) or access to the activated ELIPSE app (intervention group). The primary endpoint is the change in children's urinary cotinine levels. Secondary endpoints include parental measures to reduce SHS exposure. The intervention period for both trials is 20 weeks, with outcomes assessed at baseline, post-intervention, and 48-week follow-up. The ELIPSE project offers a novel approach to addressing key modifiable NCD risk factors within the family environment, with the goal to improve long-term child health outcomes and reducing morbidity and healthcare costs. Unlike traditional care, the ELIPSE app overcomes time and space constraints, allowing continuous support and personalised guidance. Both trials prospectively registered at ClinicalTrials.gov: ELIPSE I as NCT06208345 (15 January 2024); ELIPSE II as NCT06311162 (7 March 2024)."
Weight Trajectories Among Youths Following Residential Relocation.,"Overweight and obesity affect millions of children and adolescents worldwide, and its prevalence is increasing. To investigate the associations of changes in the surrounding residential environment following relocation on childhood body mass index (BMI), focusing on 3 external exposome domains: air pollution, the built environment, and socioeconomic disadvantage. This longitudinal cohort study used harmonized data from birth cohorts from the Netherlands (PIAMA), Sweden (BAMSE), and the Czech Republic (ELSPAC-CZ) participating in the EXPANSE (Exposome Powered Tools for Healthy Living in Urban Settings) project, with birth dates ranging between 1991 and 1997. Participants were youths aged 2 to 24 years who had experienced residential relocation during their follow-up. Analysis focused on within-individual changes resulting from relocation. k Means clustering characterized multiple exposures from the 3 external exposome domains. Fixed-effects linear models estimated associations of exposome changes with changes in age- and sex-standardized body mass index (z-BMI), adjusted for relevant covariates. This study was conducted between July 2023 and January 2025. Changes in 3 external exposome domains: (1) ambient air pollution from high-resolution surfaces; (2) the built environment, including green, blue, and gray spaces and light at night; and (3) area-level socioeconomic disadvantage indicators. Domain-specific exposome profiles were characterized as low-, medium-, and high-hazard environments. Changes in z-BMI. The study included 4359 participants (1467 from PIAMA, 1778 from BAMSE, and 1114 from ELSPAC-CZ). A total of 2215 (50.8%) were male. The mean (SD) age at inclusion was 3.0 (1.1) years, and mean (SD) age at moving was 7.7 (4.3) years. Parental education varied across cohorts. Mean (SD) z-BMI was 0.2 (1.1), 0.4 (1.0), and 0.1 (1.2) at baseline and 0.0 (1.0), 0.3 (1.0), and 0.1 (1.1) after moving in PIAMA, BAMSE, and ELSPAC-CZ, respectively. Moving to higher-hazard environments (more polluted, more gray space) was associated with increases in z-BMI for all domains in PIAMA; significant associations were also seen for some domains and exposures in BAMSE and ELSPAC-CZ. Specifically, an association between moving to a more built environment and increase in z-BMI was consistent across cohorts: an IQR increase in gray spaces was associated with increases of 0.04 (95% CI, 0.01-0.06) units and 0.05 (95% CI, 0.01-0.09) units in z-BMI in BAMSE and PIAMA, respectively. An IQR increase in air pollution hazard was associated with increases of 0.07 (95% CI, 0.02-0.12) units and 0.07 (95% CI, 0.01-0.14) units in z-BMI for nitrogen dioxide (NO2) and fine particulate matter (PM2.5), respectively, in PIAMA. Presence of effect modification by parental education and age at moving varied across cohorts. In this multicountry cohort study of 4359 youths in the Netherlands, Sweden, and the Czech Republic, moving to greener, less urbanized environments was associated with healthy childhood BMI trajectories. Heterogeneity across cohorts highlighted the context-specific influence of external exposome domains on childhood weight."
Associations of serum cotinine with asthma risk in US children: a mediation analysis of body mass index.,"In recent years, the prevalence of asthma among children has increased, with tobacco smoke exposure identified as a major contributor. However, the effects of tobacco exposure on childhood asthma remain insufficiently investigated. This study aims to investigate the relationship between serum cotinine, a biomarker of tobacco exposure, and the risk of childhood asthma, and to explore whether body mass index (BMI) mediates this relationship. Using data from the National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) from 2011 to 2018, this study analyzed serum cotinine, physician-diagnosed asthma and BMI in children aged 3-12 years. Weighted multivariable logistic regression models, subgroup analyses, smooth curve fitting, threshold effect analysis and mediation analysis were employed to examine the relationship between serum cotinine and asthma. The study found a nonlinear relationship between serum cotinine and asthma. The risk appeared to reach saturation when the Log2-serum cotinine value was -0.3 (equivalent to serum cotinine concentration of 0.81 ng/mL). Additionally, mediation analysis revealed that BMI accounts for approximately 12.21 % of the mediating effect in the relationship between serum cotinine and increased asthma risk. The present study indicates that elevated serum cotinine, a novel biomarker of tobacco exposure, are significantly associated with an increased risk of childhood asthma and that BMI plays a significant mediating role in this relationship."
Short-Term PM2.5 Exposure and Mortality in Older Adults with Asthma in South Korea.,"Despite growing concerns over the adverse health effects of air pollution, research on the mortality risk associated with exposure to fine particulate matter (PM) in older adults with asthma remains limited. This study aims to investigate the association between short-term exposure to PM2.5 and mortality risk among older adults with asthma. This study utilized the National Health Insurance Service database in South Korea and included 139,189 individuals aged 65 and older with asthma who died between 2015 and 2021. A time-stratified case-crossover design was applied to assess the short-term effects of air pollution exposure on mortality. The daily average PM2.5 concentrations were calculated for case and referent dates. Conditional logistic regression was used to estimate adjusted odds ratios (aORs) and 95% confidence intervals (CIs) for mortality across quartiles of PM2.5 exposure, adjusting for environmental variables and holidays. The highest quartile of PM2.5 exposure (lag 0) was associated with a higher odds ratio for mortality (aOR 1.048, 95% CI 1.021-1.077, p for trend = 0.022) compared to the lowest quartile. Similar trends were observed for lag 1 (aOR 1.032, 95% CI 1.005-1.060, p for trend = 0.015) and lag 0-1 (aOR 1.022, 95% CI 0.994-1.051, p for trend = 0.008). This study provides epidemiological evidence of an association between short-term exposure to PM2.5 and an increased mortality risk among older adults with asthma. These findings highlight the need for targeted preventive management strategies to mitigate health risks associated with short-term PM2.5 exposure, particularly for those vulnerable to air pollution."
Climate Change and Childhood Asthma: A Scoping Review.,"Warming temperatures are associated with increasing incidence and severity of wildfires, extreme rainfall, and large storms. To provide an updated review of research into the impacts of climate-driven environmental factors on childhood asthma, and to frame future research needs, we carried out a scoping review focused on studies reported over the past 5 years in PubMed, Scopus, Embase, and Global Health. Data appear to be especially strong for an association of exposure to wildfire smoke (WFS) with adverse asthma outcomes, including in children. Additional evidence links severe weather events, temperature extremes, and extended pollen seasons with worse asthma outcomes. Experimental studies have established several specific pathways that could link these environmental factors with disease and could suggest potential preventive or treatment strategies. Future research needs to include a better understanding of key triggers and mechanistic pathways, and on mitigation strategies that could be applied immediately. Given the complex and multifactorial nature of how environmental exposures contribute to asthma, computational approaches will probably be critical to define causality in complex exposure mixtures, improve environmental exposure forecasting, and inform personalized asthma management."
Immunomodulatory and anti-apoptotic effects of pediatric anti-cough and asthma sirup in mice with cigarette smoke extract-induced asthma.,"Asthma, a chronic inflammatory disease characterized by inflammation and immunological abnormalities, was the focus of this study, which explored the mechanisms and efficacy of a pediatric anti-cough and asthma sirup in a cigarette smoke extract (CSE)-induced rat asthma model. A CSE-induced asthma rat model was treated with a sirup containing roasted ephedra, bitter almond, gypsum, and licorice. Key markers in serum/BALF were measured by ELISA. Inflammatory cells were analyzed by Giemsa staining, pathology by hematoxylin-eosin, and macrophage infiltration by CD68+ immunohistochemistry. Lung tissue apoptosis (TUNEL), and apoptosis-related proteins (Bax, Bcl-2, cleaved caspase-3) plus phosphorylated NF-κB (all by Western blot) were evaluated. The sirup treatment significantly attenuated CSE-induced airway inflammation in asthmatic rats, shown by decreased serum IL-4, IL-5, and IL-13, and reduced inflammatory cell infiltration in BALF. It also restored oxidative balance by reversing MDA elevation and SOD reduction. Histopathologically, it alleviated peribronchial inflammation, cell infiltration, hemolysis, and alveolar septum thickening. Furthermore, it suppressed CSE-induced lung apoptosis, evidenced by fewer TUNEL-positive cells, reduced pro-apoptotic proteins (Bax and cleaved caspase-3), and increased anti-apoptotic Bcl-2, likely  The pediatric sirup holds therapeutic potential against CSE-induced asthma by regulating cytokine levels and decreasing pulmonary inflammation/apoptosis."
Inequalities and indoor air pollution: a prospective observational study of particulate matter (PM,Particulate matter (PM We recruited 321 households from the multi-ethnic Born in Bradford cohort. Low-cost commercial sensors sampled PM Homes had a mean daily average indoor PM The high indoor PM The online version contains supplementary material available at 10.1186/s12889-025-25182-x.
Interaction between genetic predisposition to successful ageing and chronic air pollution on lung disease in elderly women: results of the German SALIA cohort.,"To investigate the interplay between the genetic predisposition to successful ageing and air pollution on lung disease in healthy aged German women under the hypothesis that ageing and lung diseases share mechanisms of oxidative stress and inflammation that can be regulated by genetic predisposition and environmental factors. German Study on the influence of Air pollution on Lung function, Inflammation and Aging prospective cohort between baseline (1985-1994) and follow-up (2007-2010). Urban Ruhr area and the adjacent rural Münsterland in Germany. At baseline, 4874 women aged 55 years living between 1985 and 1994 in the setting and at follow-up examination, 834 of them participated. Chronic lung disease was defined as any of asthma, chronic bronchitis, cough (with sputum) or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. Chronic individual exposures to nitrogen dioxide (NO In 560 women (67-80 years), chronic lung disease was present in 156. Higher exposure to air pollution was associated with increased odds by up to 43% per IQR-increase in NO In elderly women, genetic predisposition based on successful ageing SNPs likely reduces the negative impact of air pollution on chronic lung disease, while a healthy lifestyle further strengthens this association."
"Factors associated with respiratory symptoms in communities living near to and away from the railway used for coal transportation in La Guajira, Colombia.","To determine the level of association between the reporting of respiratory symptoms by individuals living near and away from the railway used for coal transportation, and risk factors related to living conditions, health history, environmental characteristics, and air quality in the area. Prospective longitudinal study with 3 cross-sectional moments over a year and a half. A structured survey was conducted, through which individuals with respiratory symptoms and associated risk factors were identified. Particular matter 2.5 (PM Over 60% of households are located near unpaved roads with heavy traffic, and dwelling conditions are not suitable for human lodging with low or no exchange of air from the outside to the inside, and critical overcrowding. The results showed a higher risk of respiratory symptoms in children with a history of asthma or malnutrition living in homes with large windows that allow air to enter and exit, and in adults with a history of asthma, hypertension, or cigarette smoking. No significant association was found between the population's respiratory symptoms and the concentration of particulate matter (PM There are various factors associated with the respiratory symptoms of communities located around the road used for coal transportation by train, including the history of certain diseases in the population and characteristics of the indoor and outdoor environment of households. Int J Occup Med Environ Health. 2025;38(5):545-58."
"Impact of Dust Storms on Airborne Bacteria, Heavy Metals, and Inflammatory Markers in Asthmatic Patients.","Asthma, a chronic bronchial disorder prevalent in children/adolescents, is exacerbated under environmental conditions like dust storms. The current study investigated heavy metal levels, airborne bacteria, and serum IL-4/IL-8 in asthmatics during before/after dust storms in Iraq's Al-Anbar, Baghdad, and Kirkuk provinces. Airborne heavy metals were quantified by ICP-MS, serum cytokines by ELISA, and bacterial communities via metagenomics. Statistical analysis was performed using GraphPad Prism (p < 0.05 significant). ICP-MS revealed considerably elevated post-storm concentrations of As, Ag, B, Ba, Co, Hg, Mg, Mn, Ni, Sn, S, Ti, and V. Asthmatic subjects presented with considerably elevated IL-4 and IL-8 post-storm (p < 0.05) compared to controls (p > 0.05). Metagenomics revealed storm-induced bacterial alterations: Al-Anbar contained elevated Burkholderiaceae, Methylophilaceae, and Rhodobacteraceae; Kirkuk contained elevated Ilumatobacteraceae, Microbacteriaceae, Burkholderiaceae, and Rhodobacteraceae. Baghdad's most prevalent species included Rhodocyclaceae (50%), Burkholderiaceae (17%), and Arcobacteraceae (4.5%). Al-Anbar was significantly richer in microbes (Chao1) and more diverse (Shannon) than other regions following the dust storm (p < 0.0001). These findings indicate that dust storms raise heavy metals, alter airborne bacteria, and increase inflammatory cytokines in asthma sufferers, and these emphasize their role in exacerbating asthma in Iraq."
Gradual Increase in Lung Cancer Risk Due to Particulate Matter Exposure in Patients With Pulmonary Function Impairments: A Nationwide Korean Database Analysis.,"Lung cancer remains a significant public health concern, with external environmental factors, such as particulate matter 2.5 (PM2.5), playing a crucial role in its development. This study aimed to assess the interaction between cumulative exposure to PM2.5 and lung function impairment, focusing on the risk of lung cancer in a large Korean population. Data from the Korea National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey from 2007 to 2020 were analyzed with linkage of the national cancer registry. A total of 43,973 participants, including 386 lung cancer cases, were included, with spirometry data available to classify lung function into categories. PM2.5 exposure was quantified using geocoded address information. Logistic regression models with interaction terms were used to evaluate lung cancer risk according to PM2.5 exposure levels and in interaction of lung function categories. A significant increase in lung cancer risk was observed with higher PM2.5 exposure levels, with odds ratios (ORs) of 1.41, 1.59, and 1.68 for the 2nd, 3rd, and 4th quartiles, respectively in multivariable models. Stratified analysis showed that the interaction between PM2.5 exposure and obstructive lung function significantly increased lung cancer risk, with ORs of 2.74 for spirometric obstruction and 3.43 for preserved ratio impaired spirometry in the highest PM2.5 quartile. This study suggests the carcinogenic risk of PM2.5 exposure, particularly in individuals with obstructive lung function impairments."
Risk based ranking of prioritized pesticides: where the exposome meets comparative toxicogenomics.,"Pesticides play an essential role in modern agricultural systems by enhancing crop yields and controlling pest-related losses and are applied extensively across the globe. However, their pervasive use has led to widespread environmental contamination, including accumulation in household and environmental dust, a significant yet understudied pathway of human exposure. Despite growing evidence that dust ingestion serves as a critical route for pesticide uptake, the associated health hazards remain poorly quantified and understood. We developed a Reverse Dosimetry Evaluation System (RDES) to estimate internal exposure levels from urine (EDI"
"Ambient air pollutant mixture and lung function among children in Fresno, California.","Ambient air pollutants such as particulate matter (PM), ozone (O3), and nitrogen dioxide (NO2) have been associated with lower lung function among children. However, the reported associations could be due to correlation with other pollutants. We investigate the relationships between exposures to eight ambient air pollutants and children's lung function and apply mixture analysis to identify key contributors to health effects. The Children's Health and Air Pollution Study (CHAPS) in Fresno, California, is a prospective cohort study that recruited 299 children and assessed their lung function at two visits, at approximately 7 and 9 years of age. The children's forced expiratory volume in the first second (FEV1), forced vital capacity (FVC), and FEV1/FVC ratio were standardized using the Global Lung Function Initiative (GLI) race-neutral calculators. We assessed the children's average daily residential exposures to PM2.5, PM10, nitrogen oxides (NOx), NO2, O3, carbon monoxide (CO), elemental carbon (EC), and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), during the 1-week, 1-month, 3-month, 6-month, and 12-month periods before each visit, and the 2 years between visits. We applied linear mixed-effect models and quantile-based g-computation (q-gcomp) for statistical analysis. The children's exposures to the eight ambient air pollutants exhibited high intercorrelation: Seven air pollutants were positively correlated, while O3 exposures were negatively correlated with the other pollutants. Higher PM10 was associated with lower FEV1 and FEV1/FVC ratio, and the associations were strongest for the 3-month exposure timeframe. Q-gcomp also identified PM10 as the key pollutant associated with lower FEV1 and FEV1/FVC ratio. Among the eight ambient air pollutants, PM10 was the strongest risk factor for impaired lung function among children in Fresno. Ambient air pollution levels in this community exceed regulatory standards and are harmful to children's lung function."
Development and pilot of the BC Wildfire Smoke and Extreme Heat Action Plan: empowering patients with climate health readiness.,"Globally, wildfire smoke and extreme heat events are increasing in frequency and intensity. Western Canada, including the Province of British Columbia (BC), is impacted annually by these events, resulting in the accelerated development of public health messaging and emergency preparedness. It is particularly important to reach, educate and empower individuals who are highly susceptible to climate events, such as those with respiratory diseases, through targeted communication strategies delivered by trusted sources. We aimed to develop an evidence-informed action plan (AP) tool and pilot integration into clinical encounters with patients living with asthma and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD).The project team developed a draft tool-a BC Wildfire Smoke and Extreme Heat AP document inspired by the concept of an Asthma AP-along with a guide to support healthcare providers in addressing questions during patient counselling sessions. Iterative feedback from trained patient partners, clinicians and knowledge translation specialists was incorporated to refine messaging and delivery. Use of the tool was piloted in clinical encounters between certified respiratory educators (CREs) and patients living with asthma and COPD in two regional health authorities. Additional process and content feedback was gathered via questionnaires and focus groups.Patients (project participants) reported that AP tool use increased their understanding and preparedness for wildfire smoke and extreme heat events. While the plan was positively received by providers in a CRE role, time constraints and staffing capacity were highlighted as barriers to implementation. Suggested improvements included strengthened public awareness, preseason deployment and enhancement of content and delivery. Additional quality improvement cycles are needed to increase readability, accessibility and actionability."
Effects of Wildfire Smoke Inhalation on Respiratory Health.,"Wildfires have become increasingly frequent and severe, releasing large amounts of fine particulate matter (PM"
Seasonal PM,"Air pollution, specifically fine particulate matter (PM Summer and fall PM Seasonal variations in PM2.5 composition during winter, spring, and fall-coinciding with influenza season-likely enhance pro-inflammatory responses to viral infection, with early inflammation contributing to worsened pathogenesis."
Air Quality Index as a Predictor of Respiratory Morbidity in At-Risk Populations.,"The Mon Valley near Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, consistently reports some of the poorest air quality in the United States. Recent studies have linked air pollution in this region to poor asthma outcomes but did not examine the impact on other respiratory conditions or vulnerable populations. This retrospective study examined the relationship between the air quality index (AQI) and respiratory exacerbations of asthma, bronchitis, and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) in the Mon Valley between January 2018 and February 2020. We linked daily Air Quality Index (AQI) values for ozone, PM"
Medical-Legal Liability and Indoor Air Pollution in Non-Industrial Environments and Perspectives for Maternal and Child Health.,"Indoor air pollution (IAP) has emerged as a critical yet underrecognized threat to public health, particularly in non-industrial environments such as homes, schools, and healthcare facilities. As individuals spend approximately 90% of their time indoors, exposure to indoor pollutants-such as particulate matter, volatile organic compounds (VOCs), polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), and microbial contaminants-can lead to significant health risks. These risks disproportionately affect vulnerable populations, including children, the elderly, and individuals with pre-existing conditions. The effects range from mild respiratory symptoms to severe outcomes like asthma, cardiovascular diseases, and cancer. This review investigates the sources, typologies, and health effects of indoor air pollutants, with a focus on their implications for maternal and child health. In particular, children's developing systems and higher metabolic intake make them more susceptible to airborne toxins. The study also explores the legal and regulatory frameworks surrounding indoor air quality (IAQ), emphasizing how increased awareness and scientific evidence are expanding the scope of medical-legal responsibility. Legal liabilities may arise for property owners, designers, or manufacturers when poor IAQ leads to demonstrable health outcomes. Despite growing concern, there remains a significant research gap concerning the long-term health effects of chronic low-level exposure in residential settings and the efficacy of mitigation strategies. The evolution of smart building technologies and green construction practices offers promising avenues to improve IAQ while maintaining energy efficiency. However, standards and regulations often lag behind scientific findings, highlighting the need for updated, enforceable policies that prioritize human health. This work underscores the urgency of a multidisciplinary and preventive approach to IAQ, integrating public health, environmental engineering, and legal perspectives. Future research should focus on real-time IAQ monitoring, targeted interventions for high-risk populations, and the development of comprehensive legal frameworks to ensure accountability and promote healthier indoor environments."
Correlation Between Air Quality and the Exacerbation of Asthma Symptoms in the Population of the United Arab Emirates.,"Background Asthma is a chronic respiratory disease, characterised by shortness of breath (SOB), wheeze, cough and chest tightness, that has a significant impact on quality of life and global health. Previous studies have demonstrated that environmental pollutants, particularly particulate matter (PM"
Exploratory analysis of the impact of sex on sputum proteomic response to inhaled wood smoke in humans.,"Wildfires have surged in frequency and severity and in 2022 contributed to nearly 30% of the fine inhalable particulate matter (PM2.5) in the United States. Health effects from wildfire-induced wood smoke (WS) exposure include worsened pre-existing lung diseases and lung function, increased emergency room visits, and increased risk of premature death. Evidence suggests that males and females have unique responses to air pollutants, but sex-specific responses to WS remain understudied. To evaluate whether males and females differentially respond to WS, we analyzed induced sputum in humans following a controlled chamber exposure to WS. A total of 79 participants were exposed to 500 µg/m3 of WS for 2 hours with intermittent exercise, and a subset of participants' samples were analyzed for cellularity and cytokine concentrations and protein expression in the sputum supernatants. Cell differentials were compared between pre-, 6 hours, and 24 hours post-exposure, and proteomic and cytokine signatures were compared between pre- and 24 hours post-exposure. 368 proteins were significantly different in females and 27 were significantly different in males post exposure. Pathway analysis revealed inhibition of leukocyte extravasation signaling, phagosome formation, and macrophage nitric oxide and reactive oxygen species pathways in females versus males. Females had a lower percentage of iNOS+ and higher percentage of CD301+ sputum macrophages versus males. Overall, this exploratory analysis suggests that in response to acute WS exposure, different pathways are affected in females compared with males. Future studies are needed to determine whether this confers an immune advantage and to understand the mechanisms of sex-specific WS-induced respiratory effects."
The Causal Link Between Air Pollution and Respiratory Diseases: Evidence from Granger Causality Test.,"Air pollution can exacerbate respiratory illnesses, such as asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pneumonia, bronchitis, and upper respiratory tract infections (URTIs). This study investigated the causal relationship between air pollution and emergency department visits for certain respiratory illnesses, such as pneumonia, acute bronchitis, URTIs, and exacerbations of asthma and COPD. This study was conducted between 1 April 1 2023 and 30 March 2024. The causal relationship between the number of asthma, COPD, pneumonia, bronchitis, and URTI patients visiting the emergency department and air pollution levels was determined by conducting a Granger causality analysis. It was determined that the highest number of visits to the emergency room was in January, and the highest concentrations of air pollutants were in December. According to the results of the Granger causality test, there was a one-way causal relationship between nitrogen (NO), nitrogen oxide (NO There is a causal relationship between levels of air pollutants including NO, NO"
Influence of Saharan Dust Intrusions on Respiratory Medication Dispensing.,"Saharan dust intrusions (SDIs) are associated with poor air quality and adverse respiratory outcomes. However, their impact on real-world inhaler utilization remains insufficiently characterized. We aimed to examine the association between SDI and the dispensing of short-acting beta-agonists (SABA) and inhaled corticosteroid-long-acting beta-agonist (ICS-LABA) combinations in the Canary Islands, Spain. Pharmaceutical sales data for SABA and ICS-LABA were collected from 60 pharmacies in Santa Cruz de Tenerife (TF) and Las Palmas de Gran Canaria (GC) between June 2017 and May 2022. SDI days were identified based on daily PM Over 60 months, SABA sales were 14.8% lower in TF compared with GC, while ICS-LABA sales were 10.9% higher. SDI presence was associated with significantly higher ICS-LABA dispensations in both provinces (+5.7% in TF, +10.2% in GC), whereas no association was found for SABA. ICS-LABA sales correlated weakly but significantly with both SDI frequency and PM SDIs in the Canary Islands are independently associated with increased dispensing of ICS-LABA maintenance therapy, particularly during winter months. Dispensing data offer a valuable population-level indicator of respiratory impact from natural airborne pollution and support the integration of environmental alerts into preventive respiratory care strategies."
Wildfires and Atopic Diseases: A Review.,Wildfire smoke is a major environmental health threat that has increased in frequency and severity in recent years. A hazardous component of wildfire smoke is particulate matter ≤ 2.5 μm (PM
Respiratory incidents in response to air quality deterioration in the summer and early autumn season.,"The paper presents the results of an ecological study completed within the warm seasonal period of 01/07/2024-31/10/2024. The aim is to assess the relationship between ambient air quality deterioration and acute respiratory incidents occurring in the inhabitants of Gliwice (Poland; Upper Silesian agglomeration). The number of daily medical services (MS) due to respiratory diseases and illnesses was obtained from the register of the National Health Fund (Silesian Voivodeship Branch in Katowice). The daily mean values of aerosanitary factors in Gliwice came from the mobile air pollution laboratory of the Silesian University of Technology in Poland. The relative risk (RR) of MS was estimated using a Poisson log-linear model considering independent environmental factors (meteorological factors and air pollutant concentrations) or confounding factors (astronomical season and day of the week). The highest number of MS due to respiratory diseases refers to acute nasopharyngitis and asthma exacerbation, mostly in children aged 0-9 years. A significant impact was observed in the case of particulate matter concentration increase and number of MS due to acute nasopharyngitis, laryngitis and tracheitis, pneumonia, asthma exacerbation, in the case of nitrogen oxides appropriately acute nasopharyngitis, bronchitis and/or bronchiolitis, pneumonia, asthma exacerbation. Additionally, a longer time of exposure was associated with a higher risk of MS due to respiratory incidents. The increase in wind speed and relative humidity was significantly associated with a higher number of bronchitis and asthma exacerbation while a higher temperature and higher 8-hour ozone concentration remain protective of both MS. The results are essential for effectively communicating environmental health risks, educating the public about potential threats, and pressuring legislators responsible for legislation and risk management."
DNA methylation: a potential mediator between air pollution exposures and asthma control.,"Exposure to air pollution is known to contribute to the development and exacerbation of asthma symptoms, impacting respiratory health through complex, not yet fully understood biological mechanisms. It is hypothesized that DNA methylation (DNAm) changes triggered by air pollutants may mediate these effects on asthma symptom control. We aimed to investigate the effects of air pollution on DNAm in peripheral blood and asthma control. We also explored whether DNAm could potentially mediate the relationship between air pollution exposure and asthma control. This study included 651 participants with asthma exposed to ambient air pollutants, NO Exposure to short-term PM These findings suggest that air pollution-associated changes in DNA methylation may affect asthma control for some loci, thus help elucidate underlying mechanisms in asthmatic patients. These epigenetic alterations highlight potential targets for understanding the pathophysiology of asthma due to air pollution. While our findings suggest possible links between air pollution, DNA methylation, and asthma control, more evidence is needed to establish causal relationships and unravel the complexities of these connections."
Lung microbiomes' variable responses to dust exposure in mouse models of asthma.,"Inhalation of dust is significant and relevant to health effects. As pollution and climate change worsen in dryland regions, wind currents entrain loose sediment and dust. This potentially disperses toxic geochemical and microbial burdens throughout the region. When inhaled environmental dust and host-associated microbiomes mingle, they pose exposure risks to host respiratory health. The Salton Sea, California's largest lake, is shrinking, thus exposing nearby communities to playa dust. Therefore, we analyze the effect of Salton Sea dust exposure in murine models to relate lung microbial communities and respiratory health. We used an environmental chamber to expose mice to dust filtrate or ambient air and examined the effects of those exposures on lung microbiomes. We found that lung microbial composition varied by dust exposure. Furthermore, dust elicited neutrophil recruitment and immune responses more than mice exposed to ambient air. Sources of dust differentially affected the composition of the lung core microbiome. Lung microbial diversity correlated with neutrophil recruitment as lungs associated with inflammatory responses harbored more diverse microbiomes. Although Salton Sea dust influences dust microbiomes and prevalent taxa, these responses are variable. The composition of lungs exposed to dust collected further from the Salton Sea was more similar to lungs from ambient air exposures; in contrast, dust collected near the Salton Sea yielded lung microbiomes that clustered further from lungs exposed to ambient air. As lakes continue to dry out, we expect greater public health risks in proximal dryland regions, which may correlate with dust microbial dispersal-related changes to lung microbiomes. Dust inhalation can lead to health effects, especially when toxic chemicals and microbes mix in with the dust particles. As California's Salton Sea dries up, it exposes lake bottom sediments to wind, which disperses the dried sediments. To mimic the effect of inhaling Salton Sea dust, we collected and filtered airborne dust to use in exposure experiments with mice in environmental chambers. We predicted that inhaling small dust particles, chemicals, and microbial residues found in this dust would affect mouse respiratory health or change the microbes found inside their lungs. We found that inhaling dust led to lung inflammation, and the dust source influenced the type of microbes found inside mouse lungs. As lakes continue to dry out, we expect greater health risks and changes to lung microbiomes."
High humidity exposures and mechanisms in respiratory disease.,"Over the past five decades, anthropogenic activities have precipitated a sustained rise in global temperatures. This warming trend enhances the atmosphere's water-holding capacity, thereby elevating atmospheric humidity levels. Prolonged exposure to high humidity (HH) adversely impacts nearly all organ systems are increasingly being recognized. As the respiratory system interfaces directly with atmospheric conditions, HH exposure exerts immediate pathological effects on pulmonary structures and functions. The past decades in environmental medicine research have been characterised by a greater understanding of HH to respiratory disease. This Seminar reviews the impact of HH on a spectrum of prevalent respiratory disorders, with an emphasis on respiratory infectious diseases, chronic ventilatory dysfunction, allergic airway diseases, and particulate matter-induced lung injury."
Socioeconomic Disparities of Asthma Incidence Attributable to PM,"This study investigated the socioeconomic disparities of asthma incidence attributable to ambient particulate matter in aerodynamic diameter ≤2.5 μm (PM Asthma in children is a significant public health issue that can affect their health throughout their lives. Understanding and measuring the risk factors for developing asthma are essential to create targeted policy interventions. This study investigated the number of new asthma cases that were linked to exposure to fine particles among schoolchildren in California, U.S. We found that, in 1 year, 34,537 new cases of asthma in schoolchildren could be traced back to fine particle exposure. This study also examined how asthma, caused by fine particle exposure, affected schoolchildren differently based on their community's level of social vulnerability. Particularly in terms of race and ethnicity, our findings showed that communities with higher social vulnerability observed more new asthma cases among schoolchildren (209 additional cases per 100,000 schoolchildren). Because the differences in fine particle levels between more and less vulnerable communities are mainly due to traffic emissions, stricter regulations on vehicle emissions could help lower the number of new asthma cases in schoolchildren and address the unequal health impacts across different communities."
Biodiversity and childhood asthma: A nationwide retrospective birth cohort study in Japan.,"Empirical evidence to support an association between biodiversity and childhood asthma remains limited, and the contributions of specific taxonomic groups have been poorly understood. This nationwide, retrospective cohort study aimed to evaluate the associations between a wide range of biodiversity indices during pre-, peri-, and post-natal periods and childhood persistent asthma. We included child-mother dyads between January 2005 and January 2017 from the Japan Medical Data Center database. Species richness, net relatedness index (genetic diversity), and land-use types were defined based on the municipalities in which the children resided during each exposure period. The primary outcome was persistent asthma in children aged 4-5 years. Modified Poisson regression models were used to evaluate the association between the biodiversity indices and childhood persistent asthma. Results were adjusted for confounders and predictors of asthma, including infant sex, cesarean section delivery, parental history of asthma, particulate matter ≤2.5 µm in aerodynamic diameter, nitrogen dioxide, population density, metropolitan area status, municipality-level area deprivation index, and prefectural-level smoking prevalence. A total of 109,233 child-mother dyads were included; 34.7% of the children had persistent asthma at 4-5 years of age. Greater species and genetic diversity of freshwater fish, along with stagnant water areas, were consistently associated with a 2-5% lower risk of childhood asthma. Biodiversity during early life was heterogeneously associated with childhood asthma. These findings suggest that conserving freshwater fish species and their habitats may contribute to asthma prevention in children."
Occupational asthma: dust exposure as a contributory factor and implications for classification of respiratory sensitisers.,"Occupational asthma (AO) is an important chronic respiratory disease associated with airway narrowing. Chemicals that cause OA are regulated under the UN GHS endpoint of respiratory sensitisation. Such chemicals are typically identified using evidence suggesting work-related exposure resulting in the ab initio development of asthma, rather than simply aggravating pre-existing asthma (work exacerbated asthma; WEA). There exist predisposing and aggravating factors within and outside the workplace that influence the development and severity of the disease. Inhalation exposure to dusts is one factor and is recognised as directly causing respiratory disease, and also aggravating pre-existing disease, including asthma. Here the contribution of dusts to the development of work-related asthma has been re-examined with reference to published clinical case studies. The data reveal a link between exposure to dusts and OA, suggesting an additional role of dust in this respect may be the presentation of irritant or sensitising agents in a way that promotes the development of OA, even under conditions where exposure to those agents alone does not. We propose that the significance of co-exposure to dusts may be currently under-estimated in health management of OA, clinical identification of chemicals suspected of causing OA, and classification of true respiratory sensitisers."
Association between prenatal ambient particulate matter and childhood asthma is modified by community safety and child sex.,"Studies document independent effects of prenatal air pollution exposure and social environmental factors, including neighborhood safety, on childhood asthma development with documented sex-specific effects. Further research examining these factors jointly is needed. We examined associations between prenatal residence-level daily fine particulate matter (PM"
"Invisible hazards of ultrafine particles (UFPs) from Wildland-Urban Interface (WUI) fire smoke as emerging public health risks: A critical review of transformation dynamics from emission sources, exposure pathways, and vulnerable population to WUI fire toxicants.","This review synthesizes atmospheric chemistry, toxicology, and environmental justice to assess public health risks from ultrafine particles (UFPs, <100 nm) in Wildland-Urban Interface (WUI) fire smoke. It explores UFP emission sources, transformation dynamics, exposure pathways, and disproportionate impacts on vulnerable populations, while evaluating advanced characterization methods and identifying knowledge gaps and formulating systematic future research directions. WUI fires, driven by climate change and urban expansion, produce UFPs accounting for 77-90 % of particle number concentrations (up to 1.25 × 10 Critical gaps include standardized real-time UFP monitoring, poor understanding of aging dynamics, incomplete emission profiles from mixed fuels, and insufficient data on UFP-PAH toxicity and heavy metal emissions from electric vehicles (EVs) involved in WUI fires. This review advocates enhanced real-time monitoring and systematic future research directions to unveil the risks of UFPs from WUI Fires and mitigate WUI fire smoke impacts."
Air Purifier Intervention for Respiratory Viral Exposure in Elementary Schools: A Secondary Analysis of a Randomized Clinical Trial.,"The magnitude of school respiratory virus exposure and the effectiveness of environmental mitigation measures remain unclear. To evaluate whether portable high-efficiency particulate air (HEPA) purifiers are associated with reduced respiratory virus exposure in elementary school classrooms. This ad hoc secondary analysis was performed between July 2023 and September 2024 and used data from a cluster-randomized, placebo-controlled trial (School Inner-City Asthma Intervention Study) of HEPA purifiers conducted from September 2015 to June 2020. A total of 200 classrooms from 39 public schools in Northeastern US were enrolled and randomized. Classrooms were randomized 1:1 to receive either active HEPA purifiers or visually identical sham HEPA units (4 per classroom). School staff and investigators were blinded to intervention assignments. The primary outcome was high viral exposure, identified by K-means clustering of individual viral concentrations. Secondary outcomes included viral diversity (defined as number of detected virus types) and individual viral concentrations. Week-long bioaerosol samples were collected 3 times during 1 school year, and concentrations of 19 respiratory viruses were quantified by digital droplet polymerase chain reaction. Of the 200 enrolled classrooms (91 in the sham purifier group and 109 in the HEPA purifier group) analyzed, the median (IQR) class size was 19 (18-20) and the median (IQR) grade was 3 (2-5). A total of 532 bioaerosol samples were collected; viruses were detected in 524 samples (98.5%), with a median (IQR) of 3 (2-5) viruses per classroom. Rhinovirus was most prevalent (476 [89.5%]), while respiratory syncytial virus A and B (66 [12.4%] and 127 [23.9%]) as well as influenza A and B (94 [17.7%] and 76 [14.3%]) were also detected. High viral exposure was present in 118 samples (22.2%). The HEPA purifier intervention was not associated with lower odds of high viral exposure (odds ratio [OR], 0.50; 95% CI, 0.08-3.25; P = .46) but did correspond to a modest reduction in viral diversity (β = -1.02; 95% CI, -1.68 to -0.35; P = .003). Elastic net regression identified relative humidity, grade, winter season, and coarse particulate matter as the environmental risk factors for viral exposure. In this secondary analysis, HEPA purifiers were not associated with a reduction in high viral exposure but were associated with a modest decrease in viral diversity. Multicomponent interventions may be needed to mitigate respiratory viral exposures in schools."
Comprehensive indoor phthalate risk assessment: A multimedia exposure framework for quantifying population health risk and disease burden.,"Phthalates (PAEs) represent ubiquitous indoor contaminants with widespread occurrence in residential environments, posing significant health risks through multiple simultaneous exposure pathways. This study developed a novel multimedia exposure assessment framework integrating settled dust, air, drinking water, and food matrices to quantify PAE exposure doses, health risks, and disease burden. Among the six target PAEs, DEHP dominated in settled dust (median: 183 μg/g), while lower molecular weight PAEs prevailed in indoor air, with DBP showing the highest concentration (1319 ng/m"
Particulate matter as a possible risk factor for eosinophilic esophagitis.,"Air pollution, including particulate matter smaller than 10 (PM In this case-control study, using a large national pathology database of esophageal biopsies, EoE cases were defined by having biopsies with ≥15 eosinophils per high-powered field in the absence of other histopathologic causes. Controls were all other patients with esophageal biopsies. Patient residential addresses were geocoded and exposure to PM Among 12,062 EoE cases and 229,397 non-EoE controls, the unadjusted OR for PM Exposure to higher levels of PM"
Particulate matter 2.5 promotes pulmonary fibrosis in allergic asthma through macrophage reprogramming toward the M2 phenotype.,"Inhaled particulate matter 2.5 (PM2.5, ≤ 2.5 μm) exacerbates airway inflammation and promotes fibrosis in allergic asthma. However, most studies have focused on airway inflammation, and direct evidence linking PM2.5 to fibrosis in allergic asthma remains limited. Here, we investigated how PM2.5 promotes fibrotic progress in allergic asthma, focusing on macrophage plasticity. PM2.5 induced neutrophil-dominant acute inflammation, whereas house dust mite (HDM) induced T helper 2- and immunoglobulin (Ig) E-dependent allergic responses accompanied by airway hyperresponsiveness. Strikingly, combined exposure to HDM and PM2.5 progressed beyond airway inflammation to pulmonary fibrosis, with upregulated tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-α, interleukin (IL)-5, IL-13, IgE, collagen I, and transforming growth factor-β"
Long-term exposure to air pollution and metabolites in children and young adults in a Swedish birth cohort.,"The biochemical dysregulation underlying the adverse health effects of exposure to air pollution (AP) remains unclear. The objective of this study was to explore associations between long-term exposure to AP and the urinary metabolome. In the Swedish birth cohort BAMSE (n = 4089), urine samples were collected from a subset of participants attending clinical examination at the 4-year follow-up and from all participants attending clinical examination at the 24-year follow-up. Among paired samples and children with diagnosis of asthma and/or low lung function, non-targeted screening using liquid chromatography high-resolution mass spectrometry was applied to 4-year samples (n = 612) and 24-year samples (n = 846) and metabolites were annotated based on standard matching to in-house compound libraries (n = 260 metabolites). Time-weighted average exposure to air pollutants (i.e., particulate matter with diameter ≤10μm (PM AP exposure was overall positively associated with metabolite abundance (p < 0.002). However, metabolite-specific associations exhibited variability. At the 4-year follow-up, the first-year-of-life and prior-year AP exposures were positively associated with 8 purine/pyrimidine derivative metabolites (e.g., an increase of 2.8 μg/m Long-term exposure to air pollution alters urinary metabolites in children and young adults, revealing environmental impacts on systemic metabolism even at low levels of air pollution."
"The influence of environmental air pollutants on asthma outpatient hospital visits in Xinxiang city, China.","Recent studies have shown a close correlation between air pollution and the occurrence of asthma. A distributed lag nonlinear model was used in this research to analyze the relationship between 58,610 asthma outpatient hospital visits and daily PM"
Epidemiological and Clinical Evidence on the Association Between Wildfire PM2.5 and Pulmonary Health Outcomes.,"As climate change accelerates the frequency and severity of wildfires worldwide, the pulmonary consequences of wildfire smoke exposure have emerged as an important yet under-recognized public health concern. Wildfire-related fine particulate matter (PM2.5) possesses distinct toxicologic properties compared to urban PM2.5 and disproportionately affects vulnerable populations, including children, older adults, and individuals with chronic respiratory diseases. This narrative review synthesizes current epidemiological, mechanistic, and clinical evidence on the impact of wildfire PM2.5 on exacerbations and progression of asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), and interstitial lung disease (ILD), drawing from recent large-scale meta-analyses and international cohort studies. We reviewed data from over 30 peer-reviewed sources, including longitudinal cohorts, systematic reviews, environmental modeling studies, and public health guidelines. Special attention was given to pediatric populations, the elderly, and patients with pre-existing pulmonary conditions. Wildfire PM2.5 is consistently associated with significant increases in emergency department visits and hospitalizations for asthma and COPD, with relative risks often exceeding those of urban PM2.5. Pediatric asthma-related visits may increase by over 30% during wildfire events, while elderly COPD patients face heightened hospitalization and mortality risks. ILD patients, especially those with idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis (IPF), exhibit higher rates of acute exacerbations and accelerated disease progression with PM2.5 levels as low as 8-10 μg/m³. Mechanistically, wildfire PM2.5 promotes oxidative stress, epithelial injury, and immune dysregulation, contributing to disease exacerbation and chronic progression. Preventive interventions such as high-efficiency particulate air (HEPA) filtration, indoor sheltering, and respiratory protection significantly reduce PM2.5 exposure and related morbidity. Wildfire PM2.5 is a potent and growing contributor to pulmonary morbidity, with a higher toxicity profile than other ambient air pollutants. While acute impacts are well-documented, long-term consequences remain understudied. Urgent research is needed to define chronic health outcomes, develop interventions, and inform public health policy. As wildfires become more frequent and intense globally, clinicians must be prepared to recognize and manage the growing burden of wildfire-related pulmonary disease."
Indoor and ambient air pollution dataset using a multi-instrument approach and total event monitoring.,"Indoor air quality (IAQ) significantly influences human health, as individuals spend up to 90% of their time indoors, where air pollutants can accumulate and interact dynamically. Despite advancements in monitoring technology, challenges remain in capturing the temporal and spatial variability of pollutants and understanding the interaction between indoor and outdoor environments. This study addresses these gaps by introducing a comprehensive dataset from a controlled experimental room in Croatia, leveraging a multi-instrumental approach to monitor IAQ across various real-life scenarios. The dataset integrates measurements from low-cost sensors, reference-grade devices, and auxiliary systems to track pollutants such as particulate matter (PM), black carbon (BC), volatile organic compounds (VOC), and indoor events deemed relevant for the assessment of pollutant levels. Key experiments simulated household activities, including cooking, cleaning, human presence, and ventilation, capturing their impacts on IAQ with high temporal resolution. The resulting dataset comprises over 19 subsets. This work contributes to the Horizon EDIAQI project, supporting the development of evidence-driven strategies to improve IAQ."
Functional Variant Discovery Identifies a Novel Genetic Link Between ,"As a consequence of climate change and land use policies, there has been a historic rise in wildfire smoke across the United States and the world. While the deleterious effects of wildfire smoke and associated air pollution on asthma outcomes are established epidemiologically, genetic risks and molecular mechanisms of how wildfire smoke affects asthma are unknown. This knowledge gap hinders the identification of high-risk individuals and the creation of targeted therapies or recommendations to protect these individuals. We identified 52 genetic risk variants that colocalized with genomic responses to wood smoke particles (WSP), a model of wildfire particulate matter, and associated with asthma in the Genetic Epidemiology Research on Aging (GERA) cohort. We used additional filters to prioritize variants for direct testing of allele-dependent transcriptional regulatory function in plasmid reporters. We found that the rs3861144 variant (Odds Ratio"
Loss of E-Cadherin Alters Cigarette Smoke Extract (CSE)-Induced Damage and Repair Responses in Human Airway Epithelial Cells; Implications for Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD).,COPD is characterized by airway epithelial barrier dysfunction. We hypothesized that downregulation of E-cadherin results in abnormal responses to cigarette smoke extract (CSE) with impaired repair and increased pro-inflammatory activity. We used CRISPR-Cas9-engineered 16HBE cells with 1-2 copies of the 
Residential greenness modifies the association between long-term exposure to PM,Evidence remains limited regarding long-term exposure to fine particulate matter (PM
Health Effects from Secondhand Exposure to E-Cigarettes: A Systematic Review of Peer-Reviewed Articles from 2004-2024.,
"Pediatric Asthma in the Inland Empire: Environmental Burden, Gaps in Preventive Care, and Unmet Needs.","Asthma is the most prevalent chronic illness in children worldwide, contributing to significant morbidity, health care utilization, and economic burden. In the United States, approximately five million children are affected by asthma. This review explores the environmental contexts and lifestyle determinants of pediatric asthma, with a focus on the Inland Empire (IE) region of Southern California. The IE's unique geographic landscape and importance as a major transportation hub highlights its critical role for understanding how both environmental and structural factors exacerbate asthma burden within the pediatric population. Variables such as household income, parental education levels, and lack of community-based asthma programs were explored. Despite significant burdens, the IE remains under-represented in asthma research, contributing to persistent disparity. A narrative literature review and regional data analysis were conducted via PubMed, Scopus, and Google Scholar (2000-2025), alongside data from the CDC, CDPH, and American Lung Association. Key words used included ""pediatric asthma, Inland Empire, air pollution, asthma disparity, emergency department utilization, socioeconomic status."" Inclusion criteria were: (1) studies or reports focusing on pediatric asthma (ages 0-17), (2) articles addressing environmental, socioeconomic, or health care-related risk factors, and (3) research with either national, state-level, or IE-specific data. Exclusion criteria were: (1) articles not in English, adult-only asthma studies, and (3) publications without original data or reference to pediatric asthma burden, management, or outcomes. Titles and abstracts were screened for relevance, and full texts were reviewed when abstracts met inclusion criteria. A total of 61 studies, reports, and data sources met this criterion and were included into this review. The IE-comprised of San Bernardino (SB) and Riverside Counties- is home to four of the top five most polluted cities in North America. Vehicle emissions and industrial waste are concentrated in the region due to limited air circulation from surrounding mountains that entrap pollutants. Pediatric asthma ED visit rates in SB and Riverside were 60.5% and 59.3%, compared to California's average of 56.7%. Hospitalization rates for children aged 0-4 were also higher in SB (24.4%) compared to the state average (17.3%). The elevated rates among school-aged children underscore the crucial need for interventions aimed at improving air quality, enhancing asthma management, and increasing access to preventive health care. Pediatric asthma in the IE reflects heightened environmental risks, socioeconomic barriers, and gaps in health care access. Addressing these disparities requires targeted interventions, policies, and region-specific research to enhance long-term management strategies and outcomes for vulnerable pediatric populations."
The Role of Oxidative Stress in the Pathogenesis of Childhood Asthma: A Comprehensive Review.,"This review aims to provide a comprehensive overview of how oxidative stress drives inflammation, structural remodeling, and clinical expression of childhood asthma, while critically appraising emerging redox-sensitive biomarkers and antioxidant-focused preventive and therapeutic strategies. Oxidative stress arises when reactive oxygen species (ROS) and reactive nitrogen species (RNS) outpace airway defenses. This surplus provokes airway inflammation: ROS/RNS activate nuclear factor kappa-B (NF-κB) and activator protein-1 (AP-1), recruit eosinophils and neutrophils, and amplify type-2 cytokines. Normally, an antioxidant network-glutathione (GSH), enzymes such as catalase (CAT) and superoxide dismutase (SOD), and nuclear factor erythroid 2-related factor 2 (Nrf2)-maintains redox balance. Prenatal and early exposure to fine particulate matter <2.5 micrometers (µm) (PM"
"Immune development in urban children and its relationship to environmental exposures, allergic sensitization, and asthma.","Early-life environmental exposures influence the incidence of allergic diseases and asthma, possibly by modifying immune development. Exposure to selected indoor aeroallergens has been associated with reduced wheezing and childhood asthma. We sought to determine whether allergen exposure in early life promotes immune development and reduces asthma risk. From birth through age 7, we measured cytokine responses of peripheral blood mononuclear cells from 442 children in the Urban Environment and Childhood Asthma study. We then compared allergen and endotoxin levels in house dust collected in the first 3 years to cytokine responses, atopy and longitudinal allergic sensitization trajectories, and asthma (age 7). Cord blood cytokine responses had unique features but were poorly predictive of subsequent responses. Early cockroach, mouse, and cat allergen exposures were significantly associated with selected IFN-α, IL-12p40, and TNF responses to innate stimuli, mitogen-induced IFN-γ (cockroach and mouse), and dust mite-induced IFN-γ (mouse) at age 7. Early onset of aeroallergic sensitization was positively associated with allergen-induced type 2 responses that started at ages 1-3 years and intensified at ages 5-7. In logistic regression models, cytokine responses modestly predicted atopy but not asthma (AUROC 0.69 ± 0.14 and 0.57 ± 0.08, respectively). Associations between preschool aeroallergen exposures and cytokine responses through age 7 years suggest a possible role in modifying systemic immune development. Progressively increasing aeroallergen-induced type 2 responses were associated with early-onset allergic sensitization. In contrast, asthma at age 7 was not associated with distinct cytokine responses, perhaps reflecting the multiple inflammatory mechanisms related to early-onset childhood asthma."
Pro-inflammatory and oxidative responses to burn pit relevant desert particulate matter in macrophages: A role for TLR2 signaling.,"Particulate matter (PM) exposure is linked to many respiratory diseases such as asthma, yet the underlying mechanisms remain unclear. A large number of warfighters deployed to Afghanistan and Iraqi have developed deployment related respiratory disease. This study investigates the effects of burn pit-relevant desert PM from Afghanistan (APM) and comparative desert PM from China Lake, California (CPM) on oxidative stress and pro-inflammatory responses in macrophages. Using mouse monocyte cell line and primary bone marrow-derived macrophages (BMDMs) with or without Toll-like Receptor 2 (TLR2) deficiency, we assessed nitric oxide (NO"
Work-related airways disease and risk factors in Mozambiquan wood processing workers.,"Inhalation of wood dust particulates, bioaerosols and chemical components cause airway disease of a sensitising or irritative nature. This study investigated the disease burden and factors associated with work-related airways disease among wood processors. A cross-sectional study enrolled 450 workers from 21 Mozambican wood mill and furniture industries. Work-related asthma (WAS) and work-related ocular-nasal (WONS) symptoms were evaluated, using European Community Respiratory Health Survey (ECRHS) questionnaire. Objective assessments included spirometry, fractional exhaled nitric oxide (FeNO) and Phadiatop tests. The average age was 38 years, three-quarters did not smoke and almost half were atopic. The proportion of workers with WAS was 14% and WONS was 40%. There were 3% that demonstrated bronchial reversibility, 16% fixed airway obstruction and 5% with FeNO > 50 ppb. WONS was positively correlated with female sex [odds ratio (OR) = 2.60, 95% confidence interval (CI) 1.15-5.90] and atopy (OR = 2.04, 95% CI 1.20-3.47). Bronchial reversibility was associated with increasing age (OR = 1.06, 95% CI 1.02-1.10), atopy correlated with high FeNO (OR = 2.85, 95% CI 1.09-7.44). Processing Mutondo wood was positively correlated with WAS (ORadj = 3.68, 95% CI 1.58-8.58), and WONS (ORadj = 9.34, 95% CI 4.54-19.20). Certain wood types, Missanda (ORadj = 6.84, 95% CI 4.17-11.20), Panga-panga (ORadj = 2.31 95% CI 1.49-3.60) and Mahogany bean (ORadj = 2.52, 95% CI 1.41-4.51) were primarily correlated with WONS. Mozambiquan wood processors experience significant work-related airway disease attributable to dust particulate. Mutondo wood type, was positively correlated with both lower and upper airway symptoms, whereas other species were linked only to upper airway symptoms."
Wildfire and asthma - The prospective interventions.,"The increasing global warming trend has led to a drier landscape, which has in turn resulted in an increased incidence of wildfires. The smoke emanating from these fires has consequences that extend beyond the loss of property. This comes with the wildfire season whose smoke emanations have implications beyond loss of property. Among the health concerns regarding wildfires and smoke are respiratory diseases, such as asthma. Asthma, as a heterogeneous disease, is directly linked to other types of smoke rather than cigarettes, traffic exhaust, and industrial chemicals. Wildfires have been shown to be associated with particulate matter that act as pollutants to human life. The unprecedented increase in emergency visits during wildfire seasons is of clinical significance for its association with asthma and other pulmonary disorders. Despite the efforts of wealthy communities or nations, which have faced episodes of wildfires in recent years, the most effective protocol is yet to be developed. Given the vulnerability of individuals, including asthmatics, to the smoke from wildfires, interventions should extend beyond emergency measures. This review aims to provide a comprehensive overview of the relationship between wildfires and asthma symptoms, exploring the underlying mechanisms both "
Association between daily variations in the levels of atmospheric O,"Environmental pollution is a significant public health issue in Mexico City. Patients with respiratory or cardiovascular diseases such as asthma or hypertension often experience exacerbations triggered by environmental factors. This retrospective time series epidemiological study analyzed the association between daily air pollution levels and the numbers of medical visits for exacerbations of cardiorespiratory diseases. Records from primary, secondary, and tertiary hospitals of the Mexican Institute of Social Security (IMSS) were reviewed between 2017 and 2019. Air quality data, including PM PM This study provides strong evidence that short term exposure to elevated concentrations of atmospheric pollutants, specifically PM"
Differences in the morbidity of asthma in multi temperature zones under short-term exposure to air pollution: a systematic review.,"Different geographical locations and climatic environments lead to different impacts of specific air pollutants on the relative risk (RR) of asthma morbidity (i.e., new-onset asthma, outpatient visits, emergency department visits, and hospital admissions) in the Northern Hemisphere. Therefore, it is necessary to integrate existing data to assess the impact of short-term exposure to pollutants on the RR of asthma morbidity in the Northern Hemisphere. We conducted a systematic review and meta-analysis to evaluate the effects of short-term exposure to particulate matter (PM"
"Asthma treatment response modified by fine particulate matter, nitrogen dioxide, and ozone among Black children: A reanalysis of the AsthmaNet Best African American Response to Asthma Drugs trial.",
"Clean Air for Asthma and Allergy Programme (CAAP), a randomized controlled trial to evaluate the effectiveness of multicomponent interventions to reduce indoor triggers in childhood asthma.","Multicomponent interventions have been reported as effective strategies for improving allergen reduction and asthma control. However, few studies have evaluated the integration of an indoor air quality (IAQ) system and e-health as part of multicomponent interventions. To evaluate the effects of multicomponent interventions on house dust mite allergens, indoor particulate matter, and knowledge and trigger reduction behaviors (TRBs) of caregivers. Twelve pediatric asthmatic patients with dust mite sensitization were randomly assigned to either a multicomponent intervention group or a control group. In the multicomponent intervention group, IAQ systems were installed in participants' bedrooms, bedding covers were provided, and asthma education was delivered through the LINE application, while the control group received conventional treatment. House dust mite allergen levels were analyzed using the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay technique, and particulate matter <2.5 micrometer diameter (PM2.5) concentrations were measured at baseline, 4 weeks, and 8 weeks postenrollment. Questionnaires were used to evaluate TRBs and asthma knowledge among caregivers before and after the intervention. There were decreased Dermatophagoides pteronyssinus allergen group 1 and Dermatophagoides farinae allergen group 1 levels in the multicomponent intervention group compared to the control group; however, the reduction was not statistically significant. Indoor PM2.5 concentrations were significantly lower in the multicomponent intervention group compared to the control group after 4 and 8 weeks ( Implementation of an IAQ system and asthma education through the LINE application, as part of multicomponent interventions, resulted in a significant reduction in indoor PM2.5 concentrations and improved TRBs among caregivers."
Differential Effects of Wildfire Smoke Fine Particulate Matter Exposure on Respiratory Disease Emergency Department Visits in the Western United States.,
Characteristics and Risk Factors of Pollen-Food Allergy Syndrome in Patients With Hay Fever: A Digital Cross-Sectional Cohort Study Using AllerSearch.,"Pollen-food allergy syndrome (PFAS) is a frequent comorbidity in individuals with hay fever. Identifying risk factors and allergen clusters can aid targeted interventions and management strategies. Objective: This study characterizes PFAS in patients with hay fever and identifies associated risk factors using the mobile health platform, AllerSearch. A digital cross-sectional cohort study was conducted in Japan from August 2020 to September 2024. Participants provided demographic, medical, lifestyle, and environmental data via AllerSearch. PFAS was identified based on self-reported allergic reactions to specific fruits and vegetables. Allergen patterns were analyzed using Uniform Manifold Approximation and Projection clustering, and risk factors were assessed via multivariable logistic regression. Among 2874 participants, 2352 had hay fever, and 1788 (23.9%) reported PFAS. The most common triggers were melon (22.9%), kiwi (18.3%), and tomato (11.7%). Significant risk factors included a history of allergic disease (OR, 1.58), asthma (1.44), atopic dermatitis (1.90), urticaria (2.73), contact lens discontinuation during hay fever season (1.50), sensitivity to yellow sand or particulate matter 2.5 (3.42), and drug allergy (3.04). Seven allergen clusters were identified, with Cluster 6 exhibiting broad allergen sensitivity and the remaining clusters each associated with a single food. Onset of hay fever was earlier in Clusters 1, 4, and 6 than in non-PFAS individuals (P=.002, P=.002, and P=.002, respectively). This study highlights key factors and allergen clusters associated with PFAS using a mobile health approach. Our findings may facilitate tailored interventions and improve quality of life for affected individuals."
"Air pollution and diseases: signaling, G protein-coupled and Toll like receptors.","Air pollution is a significant public health issue that impacts lung health, particularly in vulnerable populations such as children, the elderly, and individuals with pre-existing respiratory conditions. Both natural and anthropogenic sources of air pollution give rise to a variety of toxic compounds, including particulate matter (PM), ozone (O₃), sulfur dioxide (SO₂), nitrogen dioxide (NO₂), carbon monoxide (CO), and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs). Exposure to these pollutants is strongly associated with the development and exacerbation of respiratory diseases, including asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), lung cancer, and idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis (IPF). Notably, early life exposure to pollutants such as PM, NO₂, and O₃ is linked to an increased risk of childhood asthma. Air pollution can mediate adverse effects through effects on receptor signaling pathways, particularly those involving G-protein coupled receptors (GPCRs) and Toll-like receptors (TLRs). Both of these receptor families play key roles in regulating pulmonary function and immune responses. GPCRs are involved in mediating cellular responses via cyclic AMP (cAMP), calcium and other second messengers, while TLRs initiate immune responses. Understanding how air pollutants and cigarette smoke alter GPCR and TLR function to contribute to lung disease is a critical area of study, as these receptors play central roles in regulating inflammation, immune responses, oxidative stress, airway remodeling and airway tone. Disruption of their signaling by pollutants can exacerbate respiratory conditions such as asthma and COPD. This review explores what is known about how air pollution impacts GPCR and TLR signaling, offers insights into the mechanisms underlying respiratory disease development and highlights potential therapeutic strategies aimed at mitigating the impact of air pollution on lung health."
Associations between PM,"Longer, more severe wildfire seasons are becoming the norm in fire-prone areas. Prescribed burning is a tool used to mitigate wildfire spread. However, prescribed burning also contributes to air pollution, including PM"
"Gathering baseline data to assess household energy interventions' impact on indoor air quality, occupant health, and wellbeing: In2Air a non-randomized experiment.","Tackling climate change, together with improving indoor air quality, offers a significant opportunity to improve residents' health and well-being. This requires the evidence base to inform an energy-efficient retrofit design. (i) To develop a protocol that could be implemented by local authorities across a range of housing typologies and (ii) to deploy this protocol to establish baseline conditions in  Working with the local council and the community, this baseline study (In2Air) developed and deployed a protocol across 30 single-storey one- and two-bedroom properties owned by Newcastle City Council, United Kingdom, and occupied by tenants (> 55 years). The following data were collected before homes underwent a fabric-first intervention: indoor and outdoor air quality (for ~3 weeks); energy consumption (for ~12 months); occupant behaviour and home-specific details; self-reported general health and well-being. The collected baseline data indicated that the mean PM Our study focused on changes to the building envelope across a limited number of building types and parameters and utilised fixed, low-cost sensors at indoor and outdoor monitoring locations rather than personal air quality monitors. The baseline conditions reported in this article provide the basis on which to inform and evaluate the effects of energy-efficient refurbishment across this social housing stock as part of future research. The developed protocol and the study findings offer the potential to support and inform decision-making of council retrofit teams across the United Kingdom with their ongoing decarbonisation plans. This article presents independent research funded by the National Institute for Health and Care Research (NIHR) Public Health Research programme as award number NIHR153617. Everyday activities can release harmful substances into the indoor air we breathe. Breathing polluted air can cause or worsen respiratory problems like asthma and lung diseases. It can also lead to heart problems and even cancer. Homes need good ventilation to be healthy. Making homes more energy efficient is important for combating climate change. Energy efficiency of homes can be improved by insulation and better sealing of windows and doors; however, these measures also reduce natural ventilation, so additional ventilation (extractor fans and window air vents) may be necessary. To understand how making homes more energy efficient (so-called ‘retrofitting’) affects the indoor air quality, health and well-being of occupants, we began by measuring conditions before home modifications started (the baseline). We designed a study to measure the baseline data on 30 single story, one- and two- bedroomed homes and their occupants. We measured the indoor and outdoor air qualities, energy use and asked participants to complete a questionnaire about their home and their general health. Other than three homes where smoking occurred indoors, no homes were above the current (2019) United Kingdom limits for the amount of fine particles in the air, but if we use the stricter World Health Organization (2021) limit, then 21 homes had poor indoor air quality. Typically, the highest concentration of particles was recorded during the daytime and usually around mealtimes such as breakfast, lunch and dinner. Our monitoring provided the necessary information on 30 homes and their occupants before the retrofit works began. We now need to monitor these same homes again once the retrofitting has been completed so that we can look at any changes. This future work will make recommendations to ensure that improving the energy efficiency of homes does not accidentally cause health problems for the people living in these homes."
Air pollution and alveolar health.,"Exposure to air pollution has been associated with up to 9 million premature deaths per year worldwide, with the respiratory system a key site for its effects. Air pollution exposure is a well-established risk factor for the development and exacerbation of airways diseases and lung cancer, however relatively little is known regarding the risks associated with air pollution interacting with areas of gas exchange - the alveoli and pulmonary interstitium. In recent years, evidence has emerged identifying a role in the development and progression of sub-clinical interstitial lung abnormalities as well as progression and risk of exacerbation of fibrotic interstitial lung diseases. This review outlines the epidemiologic evidence that air pollution perturbs alveolar health. It considers the different components of ambient air pollution, how penetration to the alveoli is determined by particle size and whether the response to alveolar exposure may be modulated by personal susceptibility factors. We discuss potential acute and chronic pathogenic mechanisms of injury upon the pulmonary interstitium and how these may contribute to the development and/or progression of interstitial processes. Finally, we explore current knowledge gaps and the potential for air pollution interventions in vulnerable individuals to support alveolar homeostasis and so prevent disease development and/or progression."
